MH: Thanks for playing along. Besides January's release of Giant Thief is there anything you'd like to mention to close us out?
I have seen some ebook formatters charge outrageous fees for enhanced ebooks doing no more than what I do as part of my standard service, to me this is highway robbery. I usually charge a nominal fee for each external link (mostly less than .25 per link to write and insert the code) but I have seen some business charge $200 – $400 more on top of the formatting and conversion charge.
To quote from the “press release” accompanying the new episode:
And my son’s face-this much for honor…
I mentioned in a previous post that I'm visiting Tokyo in January- very excited!! I thought I'd reminisce with you about previous trips to Japan, so today I'll tell you about my first time in Osaka last summer.
To answer that question, we need to think about the speed of the moral revolution that has pushed this question to the forefront of our culture. In less than a generation, homosexuality has gone from being almost universally condemned to being almost fully normalized in the larger society.
Born on September 15, 1956, Willie Mullins was six-times amateur champion rider in Ireland and his major successes in the saddle included the 1983 John Smith’s Fox Hunters’ Chase at Aintree on Atha Cliath when the also-rans were partnered by the likes of Robert Waley-Cohen and Aintree chairman Lord Daresbury, before taking out a training licence in 1988 and is now the country’s pre-eminent jump handler. As a jockey in the John Smith’s Grand National, his rides included The Ladys Master, who ran out in 1983, and Hazy Dawn, who fell at the sixth the following year. He hails from one of Ireland’s most famous racing families, being a son of the late Paddy Mullins, the outstanding all-round trainer whose most famous star was Dawn Run, winner of the 1984
Who ran to help the elderly couple?
Among these dark Satanic Mills?
I used to be so strong
Too often, people fall into the trap of strife. Someone says something that rubs you the wrong way, and before you know it, there is tension, quarreling and division. The Bible tells us that strife opens the door to “every evil work.” It’s the enemy’s greatest trap to keep people from living in victory. But you don’t have to fall into the trap of strife, you can rise above it. Like today’s verse says, you can simply drop the matter before it turns into something bigger than it needs to be. You don’t have to sink down to somebody’s level and argue with them and try to prove that you’re right. You weren’t put on this earth to correct everybody around you.
After church I decided to wander over to the library and see if it's open on Sundays (it isn't), and on the way there I stopped at the Commonwealth Avenue mall. (Mall as in "long, narrow park", not "place where you drink an Orange Julius and wish you had money".)
11. Junkies feat. B. Productions (prod. by Fanatikus)
Favorite song?
One morning I was laying in bed praying about an "Titanic idea" when the prodigal son story popped into my mind. Was it possible that the seed of the idea I had so many years prior fit on the Titanic? I dug back through my old computer files and found the original prologue. Then, in my mind's eye, the story of a younger son, an older son, a woman who cared for them both--and the loving father--played out in my mind.
(Non police readers who want to know more about what a ‘duty inspector does - or police officers, for that matter! – should read the bottom few paragraphs, which outline the role a bit more.)
Everybody knows that the boat is leaking
(waits for laughter to die down)
JT - Yes, yes..
A few weeks back, I was an enjoying a dinner with some good friends. Over dinner, the conversation turned to ice cream (this is a common occurrence when you hang out with me). Specifically, my friends expressed their delight at being members of the Dairy Queen Blizzard Fan Club. Every couple of months, they receive coupons for free Blizzards. All this time, DQ had been handing out free ice cream I’d been paying full price like a chump! Not long after we parted ways, I too signed up for the DQ Blizzard Club. Over the past few weeks, my husband has signed up, my sisters have signed up, and if it were allowed I’d get my cat to sign up too. I’ve now become accustomed to a weekly Blizzard, with or without coupons. It’s crossed over to that dangerous place when I eat an item of food so much I give it an obnoxious nickname. Observe:
Great cast, good music (seeing it again I note the little "heroic action!" stings and other tricks of the music more) and naturally lots of funny.
I hope those that celebrate enjoyed the day,
As discussed in earlier posts, a lot has to do with the weather, time of day, lighting and the location of the sun relative to the photographer and the dog / handler team. Also, the use of a zoom lens can remove a good portion of the background, which allows the dog and handler to become the most dominant element within the frame. But, zooming in is not always the best choice as many of the exercises require tracking the dog down the field and getting the shot at a critical moment.
Another example of the transition to a racialist America is African-Americans’ success in removing much of the negativity associated with color by changing the connotations of darkness. Black has become beautiful and not just for blacks. Furthermore, the recent preference for being called blacks instead of African-Americans suggests greater comfort in being perceived first and foremost as black Americans.
You should have seen our faces when the plate arrived = literally three tiny pieces of snapper on a plate showed up. This was $16! The fish was fresh and the sauce was tasty but I would say pass on this unless you have dollars coming out of your a*s.
Let's see... Ty is currently applying for other jobs. He's applying in Alaska as well as here in Bellingham. He applied at a Jewelers amongst other things. Good timing if he gets that, Christmas sales will be up.
We traditionally camp when we're on Salt Spring, but this time my mom and step dad rented a beautiful old heritage home for the week. The kitchen was amazing, with custom built free standing fir cabinets and an AGA. Though I've always wanted an AGA (which is always warm and ready for use), it kind of lost its charm when we were hit with a heat wave, at which point everyone gave the kitchen a wide berth.
Why: I was admiring some art from Draw Something (are you playing? I can't get enough. We literally lie in bed drawing and laughing and cornholing except Buster) when I spotted this:
#739 - Anatomy of a Murder (1959) - (#872 on TSPDT) Jimmy Stewart is one of those actors who never seem like they are acting. He is just smoothly natural with a homespun charm that covers up how sharp-witted and powerful of an actor he truly is. His performance in this Otto Preminger film is one of his finest, but such a great film as this - one of Preminger's finest as well - is already quite spectacular, even without Stewart. But yeah, he certainly makes it better. Many in the field of law have called this the most accurate look at a court trial ever put onto film, but more importantly, much more importantly (who wants truth when they can have the artifice of the most beautiful fraud in the world - yeah, I said it), is that Preminger has sewn together a succulent and quite devious motion picture experience, and one of the main contributing factors (along with Some Like it Hot and Psycho) to the eventual downfall of the Hays Code in Hollywood.
Well, the drought is definitely over. We've been getting our normal rainy afternoons almost every day for the last week or so (I think) I'm starting to remember now that we live in a sort of bog here in NF. It was starting to feel more like a dessert for a while there. (Or is it desert? I get those confused. One is a hot place with sand and one is a sweet treat... My spelling sucks.) And you know, at 48 years old, I should be embarrassed by that, but I just don't really care. Ten years ago I would have been, but now not so much. I just accept it as one of my quirks. Yea, that's it, I'm quirky!
Heh...none really..except for Del McCoury (Friday 1:50 - 2:30 Austin Ventures Stage) ...go see them and clap your hands. Does anyone else think there should be a few more? Of course my rule with Bluegrass is 3 songs is just enough.
Second, we are training Afghan Security Forces to get the job done. Those forces have surged, and will peak at 352,000 this year. The Afghans will sustain that level for three years, and then reduce the size of their military. And in Chicago, we will endorse a proposal to support a strong and sustainable long-term Afghan force.
After my own scripture and prayers, and a bit of time in the bathroom to get ready, I will then start getting breakfast ready. I am trying to be better about making breakfast for Steve before he leaves. Many of my breakfasts I will prep the night before so it's easier in the morning.
Though she walks a little slowly, she was still sharp and spunky, braving the morning heat to be able to express her gratitude.
Thanks for giving us your time. Tune in to the social media channels and conference on May 25th to find out what was suggested.
The FCC knew about the issues it now wants to study in this newest NPRM (Notice of Proposed Rule Making) before the spectrum was auctioned in 2008. Further, the interference issues were taken into account by the FCC at that time, and informed the rules under which the spectrum was auctioned and purchased.
I do think beer blogs have a valid, and dare I say important, place in beer though. Beer rating blogs are a dime a dozen. Nation wide beer blogs...also a dime a dozen. But the local beer blog I think is a vital and helpful resource, not to pat myself on the back. Also, (Warning: I am going to pat myself on the back again) blogs or sites like My Last Pint and Pints and Panels are fun (I guess not so important, but still) because of their uniqueness and creativity.
Now, THIS is what I'm talking about. No werewolves. No vampires. No British isles fairytale constructs. No Arthurian legends, creaky with age, being unfolded and poorly cleansed of the dust of ages for the nth, nth, nth time. No. This is neither the U.S. nor the UK, but Trenčín, Slovenia, baby.
Yes, wonderful colors, sunshine and blooming things!
Mom was pessimistic and tried to dissuade me. But already a budding foodie and curious about most things culinary, my argument was simple. We liked fruit. We like cake. We liked my grandmother’s blueberry cake which combined fruit and cake. It only made sense that we would like this fruitcake from Texas.
Have you played here recently? If so, please share your comments.
11. Feature stories come in many forms. What are at least four of the most popular types of features, according to Harrower? Bonus: What type of feature will you be writing during the next week?
The SF Arts Commission reeled from stupid decision to scandal as news broke that they had chosen former dog murderer Tom Otterness for a huge project to make sculptures for the Central Subway - which is another scandal but not an artistic one. Eventually, the commission "fired" him but because of legal issues, still had to let him keep a substantial portion of the grant money. Lots of SF artists were asking why the "SF" Arts Commission couldn't chose a local artist! http://www.sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?f=/c/a/2011/12/31/DD941MG3BJ.DTL
All that walking is as rejuvenating as the sleep and relaxation. It's also a key to eating pastry without guilt or weight gain. We typically cover 8-12 miles a day in Paris, but with all that walking we're paradoxically less hungry. My theory is that the food we are eating is so delicious that we need less of it to feel satisfied. We've never dined at any restaurant with a star, Michelin or otherwise, while in Paris. We prefer to find neighborhood bistros, or stock up on cheeses, fruit, bread and chocolate at the little epicerie around the corner from our hotel. The epicerie is pricier than a grocery store, but they have a fabulous selection of cheeses, and they make amazing puff pastry tomato tarts with pesto. Or we pick up a couple of pastries from a patisserie (always checking Paris Pâtisseries first). We open our window and stare down at the rooftops of the city we love while enjoying our room picnic.
As a two-time beggar I will go,
We went to a newer tapas restaurant and sat at the bar. I drank a couple Heinekens while my wife had a couple liquor drinks. We ordered a few of their tapas selections and started eating.
Evil bug
Movement: every now & then..love those little flutters!
So now a short break in writing while I make coffee. 'Scuse me.
The Full Moon of April is usually called the Egg Moon. In Algonquian it is called Pink Moon. Other names are Sprouting Grass Moon, Fish Moon, Seed Moon, and Waking Moon. In Hindi it is known as Hanuman Jayanti. The Full Moon rises around sunset and sets around sunrise, the only night in the month when the Moon is in the sky all night long. The rest of the month, the Moon spends at least some time in the daytime sky.
Despite being selected by the Philadelphia Flyers in the late rounds of the 1994 NHL Entry Draft, he never was invited by the Flyers to participate in a training camp and came to North America as a free agent in 1997. He started in the lower reaches of the minors, first with the Baton Rouge Kingfish of the ECHL. He then joined the Manitoba Moose of the IHL for 14 games, going 8-4-1-1.
Is how the wizard "Amazing" Kreskin described their foes in the graveyard of Barrow Island. In last night's Weird Adventures game (in Lorefinder), Boris, Kreskin, and Don Diabolico were ambushed by ghoul hooligans out for dangerous kicks. The punks got danger in a lethal dose: The fact that that were teenagers didn't spare them from the guns of our hardboiled adventurers. Only one of the three attackers escaped with his life.
thanks so much for entering and spreading the love! :)
Little Rock Arkansas
Hilla’s Well Acquaintance: +6 All Stats, +2 Weapon/Magic ATT, +120 Weapon/Magic DEF, +60 Accuracy/Avoidability. You get it by clearing Hard mode 50 times :/.
PT: For many entrepreneurs, starting their company may be their first experience in a business management role – how can strong leadership skills better assist them in their new endeavor?
With Hanna’s retreat from the spotlight and the failed media blackout controversy, the second half of Girls to the Front feels much different from the first. The LA Times Evelyn McDonnell put it simply: “If the first part of Marcus’ book is exhilarating, the end can be depressing. Instead of supporting ‘girl love,’ as they’d earlier vowed, members turned against one another and their male sympathizers.” Corin Tucker and others took Fugazi to task for its song “Suggestion” which describes sexual harassment from a female perspective. As Marcus points out, few other male bands of Fugazi’s reputation even broached the subject let alone accused its audience of complicity, yet to some in the RG it sounded “like a self righteous white boy appropriating girls’ issues so he could appear more virtuous.” (116) Hanna dismissed similar efforts by other bands: “A lot of this white straight edge boy thing singing about sexism is so incredibly stupid to me, I just can’t even deal with it.” (229)
Rewards have no expiration date.
The Russian Foreign Minister stressed that the Security Council should adopt what will be issued by the UN observers not by the group of the so-called Friends of Syria, adding” they say they will evaluate how the Syrian leadership is implementing Annan’s plan, which is unacceptable.”
The experience was entirely different, amusing and therapeutic. I didn’t really have to travel a thousand miles to find a place conferring immunity to life’s injustices.
I try to stay pretty happy. Even when I’m angry, the anger is fleeting; I try to revert to “sunny side up.” Today, however, is just one of those days that seems intent on not being a good day.
“While alcoholic liver disease remains the number one killer linked to alcohol, more and more people are suffering from oral cancers — and record drinking levels have undeniably played a part.”
Always visiting
Jeff Andrews – I have been (and continue to be) influenced by so many things. Amazing master designers like Billy Haines, David Hicks and Andre Putman have definitely inspired me. More contemporary designers like Barbara Barry, Kerry Joyce and Roy McMakin have continued to influence me on different levels. I would have to say that I am most influenced by people of talent and taste that have lived a life of style that we most of us can only dream of and learn from…Yves Saint Laurent, Rudolph Nureyev and Coco Chanel to name a few. It is all about pulling bits that inspire you most and making them your own in design that make it a personally rewarding experience.
So why are the people voicing dissatisfaction with the ending of a product they loved, in this medium, suddenly whiners/cretins/bros/entitled? I think it’s a statement of optimism on the complainer’s part really. They know that video games offer the chance to be continually upgraded/changed (through DLCs and mods). Knowing that, why wouldn’t they suggest they want an ending they like? It’s like telling someone at a restaurant that they can’t add or subtract anything to the dish they order, because “that’s going against the chef’s vision.” My request for capers or no mayonnaise doesn’t make me entitled. It means I’m using the service as it is expected in the given situation. The folks at Bioware pretty much promise that there’s going to be DLC available (and there was already some on launch day), so it isn’t even like these gamer/restaurant-goers are going to a really expensive, high-end dinner (where it is Not Done to request substitutions. At those restaurants you really are going and paying for the chef’s vision). They’re going to a Red Lobster and are upset when the server, chef, and other patrons call them babies for not wanting the french fries, but would prefer broccoli instead.
There are 2 shades to this, #1 Light Beige and #2 Natural Beige (which I bought). I’m thinking the recommended retail price of this is 60,000Won, which is around US$56. However, the duo cost me only US$72, so each was just USD$36!! Pretty amazing deal if you ask me =)
I've been missing the sun for a whole 2 days here in NYC. And what with elections happening, it is officially time to flee the country. Imediamente. En Jueves.
It has a smooth, clean interface, great community, and is a more than adequate tool for your daily 9GAG needs. Of course, much of the content is what you would consider to be NSFW, but in all honesty, you shouldn’t really be using 9GAG in the work place, now should you?
Originally I named these “Samincha ” #Blessed in Quechua# because that is how I feel when I wear them so I combined both names because it was a magical combination.In the Powhatan language Pocahontas means “playful one” Her birth name was Mataoaka.”Samincha “#means Blessed in Quechua# are: handmade of antiqued metal, seed bead, filigree , Coral, swarovski, crystal and Love ♥
"Oh, my gosh!" I exclaimed, looking around the cobbled square and its adjoining restaurants and shops. "Black Dress Girl, this is so nice! How have I never known all this was here?"
But early in Walt Disney’s career, he wasn’t always successful.
- You can also eat the green leaves? Wash them, cut them into little slices and stir-fry them for a couple of minutes.
Now how about some Johnny Russell. Kinda my tribute to this D r i f t g l a s s crowd and their nonsense. I thought about using the classic Weather Girls tune It's Raining Men as a tribute but just did not want to be accused of being intolerant. Or something.
You see Juan, I saw a young black male rob Meijers. He had on hip-hop style clothing and sneakers. Nikes.
ANC Supporters making what Channel 4 News reader Jon Snow called "salutes to the far right"
I am sooo sorry that I haven't been writing in my blog for sooo long... I have been busy helping my Granny pack! She is moving up to Dawson Creek! Mom and Dad have left the farm to help move the furniture and boxes... They are now in Hundred mile and are soon to be here tomorrow... Granny and I have packed over 30 boxes now and soon to be more:) Anyways I thought I would let you know!
Realistically, about four of you are going to read this long article and you are most likely related to me hence feeling slightly obligated...thanks I hope you enjoy it. For the rest of you....
God gave me an angel right here on earth
We followed this road
Real Ale Lost Gold IPA - the Dog and Duck Pub
Not for me the brilliant adventures, the flying-carpet view,
I second that motion? Anyone care to vote?
Hosted By:
Mr Smith is now part of a global community of more than 500 “car lovers” brought together by internet forums.
Small bar in a great city, after seeing the size of the brew house, I am surprised we got any bottled stock of this at all!
Haha…I don’t think we know either! I reckon it’s iBURN and before you say it, yes I know there’s a whiff of plagiarism there but sadly we haven’t been sued by a certain American multinational corporation, I don’t even know if I like the name of the band but how ever written or whatever name it could have been it’s the music that matters to us.
Here are a couple pics!
Well, we are at the half way stage of our birthday hop, the good news is that there is still a week left to enter. So, make sure you hop on over to our fabulous DT and leave us a message on our birthday hop posting to be eligible for entry into our prize draw.
The reality is, I am not using one Google extension or FireFox add-on. Not a single one. At least, if it did not come pre-installed, I am not using it. I used to use the add-blocker that was famed on FireFox, but to be honest, I have left that browser, and even am using IE a lot less in favor of Chrome. I might not like Google as a company much, but Chrome is a pretty solid, fast and ‘visually’ light browser.
After completing the installation and turning the printer back on I kept getting the alarm notification to close the cover for the unit to work (it will not work/print if it is detecting the cover is not closed).
This one…
So this little idea spawned with my love of indoor plants and my horrible luck of being unable to keep them alive.
How to find a plan that will help produce a brochure on some of them to check out some of their floor plans. A great idea is to visit some of the manufacturers of these people if possible. Go talk to a salesperson, Log Home Plans you can ask a question through your mind. Most of the staff are very pleased to help you in choosing a friend.
A Zentangle®, in the traditional sense, is done in black and white with pencil shading. I was asked one time in a Zentangle class why it is that we only use black and white - and to that i answered Zentangle is designed to remove the obstacles that we place in front of ourselves when beginning art.
Some 1,000 protesters marched in Tel Aviv on Saturday night in a show of opposition to the possibility of an Israeli strike in Iran. Over 2,300 citizens confirmed their attendance on Facebook. The march, titled "Israelis against a war with Iran," began at Habima Square and was expected to conclude with a rally at Meir Park.
Overall the walking/jogging wasn’t all that bad, maybe I am in not nearly as bad of shape as I was thinking before. My legs didn’t really feel like jello till the very last jog. One the cool down walk, that is when I started to feel my knees starting to hurt.
Put the ground beef, bread crumbs, Parmesan cheese, oregano, garlic powder, salt & pepper in a large bowl.
We went looking for ELK...yes, I said ELK....it seemed to me a good time to get out the camera and snap my very first picture of an ELK....and so we took off over the Malahat with our picnic basket and the camera.....oh and a tank of gas! Did you know that Vancouver Island has the largest ELK and the smallest DEER! Yep, just a little tidbit I knew you would want to have! We took off fairly early knowing it was going to take us awhile to find that ELUSIVE ELK and have a few side trips besides!
I started saving again.
About the author: Nickolas Johnson is an Intern Scholar at the Oakland Institute (OI) majoring in Political Science at San Francisco State University. This backgrounder on Concord Agriculture in South Sudan is based on OI’s project, Understanding Land Investment Deals in Africa: Country Report South Sudan. Download the full report publication from this link.
She’s been there with a card in the mail, to give a comforting word, albeit from the distance. For a girl that got all the trappings of life later on, she sure understood.
External additions can be problematic if your bigger and better house is out of character with the surrounding neighborhood in size and style. It can be even worse if your do-it-yourself project lacks professional polish. Even more modest improvements — such as doors, windows or awnings — can hurt if they don’t match your home’s architectural style.
"Isn't there a question about what we should be spending our money on?"
Casey’s Contraptions:
Moderate consumption of alcohol (1-2 drinks daily) increases the levels of HDL cholesterol in blood. However, it does not lower the amount of LDL cholesterol. Although drinking alcohol in moderation is considered to prevent heart diseases, no consensus has been reached by the medical fraternity regarding this belief. In fact drinking too much alcohol raises triglyceride levels and increases blood pressure.
Know yourself: understanding the Asian investor
Now we have animal poems on our agenda for this morning.
Coming down from the mountain to a new life in the city seems a thrill beyond imagining. When Miri and her friends from Mount Eskel set off to help the future princess Britta prepare for her royal wedding, she is happy about her chance to attend school in the capital city. There, Miri befriends students who seem so sophisticated and exciting . . . until she learns that they have some frightening plans. They think that Miri will help them, that she should help them. Soon Miri finds herself torn between loyalty to the princess and her new friends’ ideas, between an old love and a new crush, and between her small mountain home and the bustling city.
city has authority to accept contracts for goods or services without approval of the City Council or the expected competitive bidding process. The face shields and aerial surveillance technology are the first use of this allowance.
Regarding Health Benefits of public workers: I believe the current reform law calls for a return of this issue to the negotiable list of items in 2014. Under my administration, it shall remain a negotiable issue although, as with wages, we will strive to achieve uniformity throughout New Jersey.
I paused. Because life had taught me a lot of things by this point and one of them was – not everyone wants to know the truth all the time. They want to tell you SOME things, so you’ll know they have a life. Maybe they want you to think it’s cool or eccentric, maybe they’re looking for comfort. What they don’t want you to do, is tell them how you really feel, which in this case was APPALLED.
At one point, I asked about THE ULTIMATE GOOD LUCK, and if he’d written it as a crime novel. Well, yes, he said, sort of; he took Robert Stone’s DOG SOLDIERS for inspiration, but he considered DOG SOLDIERS to be a literary novel.
Just for today I will put my family into God's hands for safe keeping. He can sort out all of these details in ways I can't even imagine.
Ps. Sophie's coming back in a week! I haven't seen her like at all this summer. miss u!
“I’ve got information all right!” I said chuckling. “The author of the notes confessed to me a short while ago. And it wasn’t Giovanni!”
Minorities: Broadly refers to anyone who isn’t a white American. According to the Book of Mormon, God invites “all to come unto him and partake of his goodness; and he denieth none that come unto him, black and white, bond and free, male and female; and he remembereth the heathen; and all are alike unto God” (2 Ne. 26:33). Because all are alike, church members are counseled to “marry those who are of the same racial background” (Aaronic Priesthood Manual 3).
Freshly ground pepper to taste.
brick red facades stare
May 17th: The Wedding Tag: Watercoloring with Distress Inks by Guest Artist Anita Houston
Bake for about 1 hour, or until the center reads 170 degrees on a meat thermometer.
You see, Harold convinced his followers, something “did” happen on May 21. It just didn’t happen where anyone could see it. It was a “spiritual” event. God judged the world on that day, and closed the door to salvation. (Like when God closed the door on Noah’s Ark once Noah and family were inside.) Only those who were inside the Ship on that day will be saved when the Ultimate End comes on October 21 and the whole world is destroyed. The job of Family Radio now is only to “feed the sheep” inside the Ark. Only five more months to sail, and then all the waiting will be over. Really. Guaranteed.
Caitlin
This is his first match and he made all of us proud. Way to go Rap!
09. Petit Kid Everett
Whoa-Oh!!
I cannot comprehend the turmoil, upset and distress Michael, his wife, family and friends have experienced over the past few days. My thoughts and my support are with him, and I would hope all those who have followed his blog and the advice and warnings he writes on an almost daily basis provide the same thoughts and support. In doing so, he has found himself the victim of a despicable attack on a platform of the Internet so many authors now use to have their voices heard and their books bought and read.
This Immature perched too close to Delilah. She wouldn’t have any of this & flew straight at it! She even raised her talons when they almost clashed!
Harvesting Maple Syrup.
Deeper than spoken I love you's.
someone you have never met in person,
We totally trust that Lisa and the Twilight Moms will make sure every penny reaches Yara and her family. And every penny will help them rebuild the pieces of their world.
Well firstly I am a farmer, and the old adage, stick with what you know, has some merit to it. I like farming, my family has been farming for more generations than anyone knows, so why not.
He lets it go with a shrug of his shoulders, spins me around and smacks me on the ass again. This time even harder and it’s all I can do to not wince. I turn and sit on the edge of his bed to avoid another strike.
So, I'm giving it away.
Things to Check Prior to Choosing a Swimming Pool Service
I had pointed out that even the anti-Catholic writer William Roberts calls this merely "the opinion of its Roman editors". Bob replies:
April 20– Easter Sunday– New York City– The New York Times reports that “The Sanitary Commission asks Contributions for the aid and relief of the volunteer army. There will in all probability soon be many wounded men to provide for, and our troops on the Southern coast are endangered by the unhealthy season now approaching. There is, therefore, special need of public liberality on their behalf . . . . Contributions may he addressed to George T. Strong, Treasurer. No. 68 Wall St., New York.”
Calmly waiting - that's how I feel most days about this PG. Happy
Adding emotion to your list of motives will support you even longer e.g learning the language because your grandparents come from a different country, or you would like to better understand that handsome exchange student....
8. Forgiveness and Salvation in Isaiah 53
Perhaps, it would be a good move for Labour to adopt a more mature attitude of a similar spirit, sort out which message it wants to get out and act in a more constructive manner and work with the government to find a solution. At the moment the Labour party appears opportunistic, not only on policy relating to income, tax evasion and charity giving but on a range of issues. Labour needs to start showing itself as a credible alternative as a government rather than an anti-coalition party. Or maybe that’s their election strategy and they’ll just fill in Miliband’s blank sheet of paper if and when he gets into Number 10…
Whining. Complaining. General unhappiness and dissatisfaction.
Hmmm what to do next?
I competed my first trade with Craig2 over on the SCF hockey boards. He posted a bunch of cards he was looking to move, and one caught my eye. I requested a price and a scan, and though he couldn't provide a scan at that time, he informed me the card featured a patch piece nicer than similar ones found on eBay. He said he'd send it my way and I could just send him $5 or so later on.
But the thoughts are trickling back, and I know that the more I write, the more they'll start flooding back, and so relief is in sight there, too.
The interior cabin (no window) goes for $2,150 per person based on double occupancy.
"Ekalesia Niue (Niuean Church - a Protestant church closely related to the London Missionary Society) 61.1%, Latter-Day Saints 8.8%, Roman Catholic 7.2%, Jehovah's Witnesses 2.4%, Seventh-Day Adventist 1.4%, other 8.4%, unspecified 8.7%, none 1.9% (2001 census)".
5:4). God expects you to experience victory everyday as far
Her mother explained that each of these objects had faced the same
Our family of four also relocated to Mom and Dad's after our AC quit working. I'm happy to report the cold air is now blowing, and we're thrilled to be back in a cool house.
He gulped the water and took a breath and wiped his face with a microfiber car cleaning cloth.
1. Scarlet Begonias - 9:29
by Rachel Hauck
It was definitely time to try a new enchilada sauce. This sauce goes with an enchilada recipe I'll be posting shortly. I decided to throw out the chile powders for this one and use actual dried chiles. Chipotles are a spicy, smoky dried chile that work in a lot of dishes. This one worked well with the addition of a little cinnamon and some oregano.
04. Miss Sun - Boz Scaggs / 5:32
As for Craigslist? I managed to sell off or give away everything in my apartment. I was even loading a mattress on a truck minutes before heading to the airport. And when I sat down on the plane, I collapsed into a puddle of fatigue and weepy gratitude for the friends I kept and also for those I left behind.
I reach around rubbing her pussy
Yes I know sleep deprivation is part of the deal. But suffice it to say we were overwhelmed. There were tears. There were moments of sheer panic, dread, and fear.
In a medium bowl, mix together the yogurt, garlic, lemon juice, ¼ teaspoon salt, and ⅛ teaspoon pepper. Add the chicken and turn to coat. Refrigerate for at least 30 minutes and up to 2 hours.
"Far better to create one living line/Than learn a hundred sunk in fame's recline."
A DAY IN THE LIFE OF YOURS TRULY!
Sending everyone lots of love out there in honor of Valentine's Day. Have any big plans? My man and I will be having a mellow evening in tonight... although we already sort of celebrated on Sunday by going to a Swell Season concert at a teeny venue (this was our 8th time seeing them live. I'll admit it. We're groupies and proud). As always when seeing Glen & Marketa perform, it was magic.
In addition to the distillery itself there is a comfortable tasting room (including some seating outside), a gift shop, and a small museum. Lebanon has only recently shown up on my radar. It's a lovely little town with a nice historic core. The big attraction for bourbon fans is Kentucky Cooperage, the Kentucky branch of Independent Stave, which makes most of the barrels for the bourbon industry. Lebanon is the seat of Marion County, which as the name suggests was founded by and still has a large Catholic population.
Looking at them. Through them. Through you. Big honey eyes mixing in a kaleidoscope of grey and green. You run. He runs. And you know he is right behind you, which feels like the greatest thing on earth.
I know, I know. It's lazy blogging. But I just saw this and couldn't resist. So, for those of you who liked Cat Vs Printer, here is....
Even in the performance fronts, it has been widely touted that the capabilities of Windows 8 clearly beats Windows 7 by far. You could argue that the tests or the reviews are based on the Windows 8 developer version, which is true but yet the results that these benchmarks came up with are stunning.
Now for some background on the name Aurora. I have always adored the name since learning that Aurore (Dupin) was the name of Chopin’s one and (possibly only) true love.
Milky Way - beige (taken from the music paper background) - 240.224.200
As for my father, he just loved me.
Jerrell Harris, Atlanta Falcons
December 24, 1986
This is going to look fantastic when it's finished! Mum went on a course for this quilt but she designed some of the cross shapes herself, I think they're brilliant. Mum gave me my first proper quilting lesson while I was at home over Easter so watch this space to see my progress!
Now doesn't this book has a great cover? League of Strays has been featured here on it's recent cover reveal. My thoughts about the cover here. I've been eying on this book for quite sometime now. With the recent cover reveal I can say that this book has intrigued me and I cannot pass the chance to feature it again here on Waiting on Wednesday. If you are one of the few who are waiting for this book, you have to wait 6 more months before this book hit the shelves! League of Strays comes out October 1st. Meanwhile lets just feast on the beautiful cover...
23. Just Another Girl Called Judy - 1964
But we know how this ends, right? Of course we do.
Everything that I used for the recipe can be seen above. I made sure to get pure pressed juice that didn't have any preservatives as this doesn't agree with the yeast too well apparently. It wasn't that much expensive than the concentrate so all was fine there.
While I was on the search for an agent, one of the things I found most fascinating were “agent stories”. I wanted to know the tricks and secrets, maybe glean a little from those who had jumped from the boat of the agentless to the boat where every sentence begins with, “My agent said…”
The secular reviewers of the Twilight series call it, “A dark romance that seeps into the soul.” The original title of Twilight was “Corpse,” but the publisher changed it to make it more appealing. The content of Twilight is in opposition to many Scriptures: it promotes sorcery, divination and witchcraft . Yet some church youth groups and “Christian” movie review sites suggest the relationship and sexual tension of two teenagers, one being a demonic vampire, draw parallels with Christian morals with lessons for the Christian to be found within the stories!
-John Waters
Tim Holtz Grunge Board
to display in your post or on your blog so others can join in the fun as well!
Coming to Christ is denying ourselves and our will as our will is connected to our flesh as we were once slaves to. Christ is our master and Lord, our will now revolves around him. Matthew 6:33 But (A)seek first (B)the kingdom of God and his righteousness, (C)and all these things will be added to you. God instructs us to seek after Him alone and let tomorrow worry for itself as this goes against our very will. In hindsight, Jesus could be calling us to faith, trust,hope and love in him as it would take faith to cast away our worries for ourselves, endure the backlash from the world for doing what Christ says and to follow a God that the world hates.
The Tower already exists.
The den. This is mostly my husband's space that we designed and decorated when he was bishop, so that he could have people over to talk. But I like that it has that kind of history. It has become, since that time, the refuge. When the kids come in they are a little more careful to keep it clean and to even speak a little lower. We write in here. We sing and record in here. We read and gather our thoughts.
the oven to 350°F. Butter a 9-inch Springform pan and place it on a baking sheet lined with parchment or a silicone mat.
- Article XX of the Association Agreement has become Article 55(3)(c)
That didn’t mean I was done, though! I had a coffee, and with the coffee came some wonderful macarons, petit fours and chocolates:
Simone’s favorite movies at the moment are Meet the Fockers (it’s a long story) and The Muppet Movie (although when the frog bounty hunter shows up near the end, she gets scared and asks me to switch it off). Her favorite book is King Bidgood’s in the Bathtub. We’ve both been digging the Danger Mouse faux spaghetti western soundtrack Rome. It’s killer: the best soundtrack to a nonexistent movie, ever. It’s one of the only albums she doesn’t switch off after a few minutes.
I used Staz-on Midnight Blue ink. I still thought I might draw patterns at this point, and I don't like to mix blacks, so I went with the dark blue. Staz-on is waterproof, and I knew I'd be adding more water.
The Duck-Rabbit Craft Brewery Duck-Rabbit Milk Stout
“I heard that, Mel.” Betty said in pretended annoyance as she came back in the room. “There he goes again,” she continued, talking to me now, “He always likes to pretend like he’s all high and mighty, but inside all that toughness, he’s just a big baby.”
Check back the week of Feb 1 for more details!
I wanted gold-colored handles to tie in with the cabinet handles and the general color scheme of the room. I was debating between drop pulls and ring pulls and decided to go with ring pulls in the end, although I think either would have looked nice. I found some nice round brass ring pulls from Lee Valley.
I was pleased with my results and then I started my hunt for paper. Ordinarily I pick out my papers first and then color. I'm really not sure why I didn't do that this time but I really couldn't find any papers in my stash that were worthy of such a beautiful image. (Actually, I couldn't find any that matched!) That meant having to go to Enchanted Cottage on my lunch break to see what I could find. Well, I found three papers that I thought would make a lovely combination so I bought them and as soon as I got home from work, I hit my stamp room determined to make another "Fran-tage" beauty. The more I looked at the pink patterned paper from Creative Imaginations, the more I wanted to use the touching "Hope" message printed there. I'm a cancer survivor so this is something near and dear to my heart. I cut out my image and started playing around with the paper but I just couldn't get it configured in a manner I felt was right for "Fran-tage." I had cut my base to be a 6" square from Bazzill. I cut my bottom layer of patterned paper from Creative Imaginations in a 5 3/4" square. I cut two strips of the green Karen Foster patterned paper about an inch wide and I then edged each strip with a Martha Stewart punch. From my Creative Imaginations "Hope" paper I cut my middle panel to fit the word across the bottom section. I adhered the punched strips to each side of the top layer and centered both top and bottom layers on my base. In order to add some texture to my image, I added some of the new fresh green and lavender crushed glass glitters from Stampendous! I used glossy accents to hold my glitter on and as soon as it was dry enough, I pop-dotted my image onto the card. I added a little sheer pink ribbon with a pearl as an accent. I chose the pearl because even with something as small as a grain of sand irritating the oyster, something as beautiful as a pearl can grow. There are many things in life that irritate us but we can still radiate beauty from within if we choose to. I would like to think that because of my cancer, I'm now able to see more of the beauty in life around me. I still tend to rush through my days sometimes but I'm far more aware of my surroundings and of how blessed I am with God's grace to still be here. So, without further ado, here's my card. I hope (no pun intended) that you like it.
We will compete in the pair on Thur then fours for the rest of our time there. The focus has always been the same. Go as fast as you can in each boat and give the best showing for the work that has been done. We are still pre Christmas so I am not expecting any early presents but I am anticipating that we should be able to produce a number of good solid performances. I am not playing things down here rather being realistic about what needs to be done and how we set ourselves to continue and progress moving forward.
I walk through the rooms and halls and remember. Or try to remember. The kidadults are upset. This is their childhood home. This is our past. Our history. Their height markers are still on the doorjambs of their bedroom closet doors. How tall they have become. How small they once were.
* Clean up as I go - If I bake, I wash up and put away as I go, leaving the kitchen clean and tidy throughout the day rather than an overflowing sink of dirty dishes nightmare after dinner - YUK!
I, like most Americans who’ve taken time to listen to the choruses of unending diatribe coming from these people, notice that it’s remarkably the same screed coming from group to group, wherever these people congregate… if it can be called a message. It’s actually more of a melange of regurgitated Marxist claptrap. Right from the mouths of leftist agitators, college and university professors, even high school and grade school teachers. This is what our billions and billions of education dollars purchased.
Blur and Gorillaz mainman Damon Albarn has invited Noel Gallagher to collaborate with him later this year.
Spring is a beautiful time of the year in Brisbane with Jacarandas blooming throughout the city. It’s a very colourful display that leave beautiful lavender sprinkles on the ground. This is without a doubt my favourite tree.
However a further point to be clarified is that the mere appearance of contradiction between two statements (either Qur’an or Sunnah) is not sufficient to claim abrogation. There must be a divine evidence to state that the abrogation is actually relating to the abrogated. There must be a clear context concerning the occurrence of the abrogation. There are a number of incidents where two, apparently contradicting revelations where implemented in total compatibility. Concerning the above verses from At-Taubah they should be understood without abrogation.
They cite example of farmers, like Papamma, who have already started a second green revolution. Her house is full of vegetation. Not an inch of waste land around Papamma�s house or farm can be spotted. �Do you see the black sprinkles on the leaves and the beans? That is cow dung water I sprinkled to avoid pests,� says the 60-year-old Papamma who lives in D. Kurubarahalli, a remote village in Kolar, nearly 90 KM from Bangalore.
Otherwise – do rush out and buy the newie from The Caretaker as it is fantastic; do play Ramesses very loud; and don’t forget if you are ever feeling down you can always turn to The Monkees for support.
‘For through the law I died to the law so that I might live for God. I have been crucified with Christ and I no longer live, but Christ lives in me. The life I live in the body, I live by faith in the Son of God, who loved me and gave himself for me. I do not set aside the grace of God, for if righteousness could be gained through the law, Christ died for nothing!’ Galatians 2.19-21 NIV.
So they dug all day
Well, and I admitted to have left matches in one of the bags and they wanted me to take them out. Since they might explode, I guess. They also asked me to remove the disconnected battery, which I did assuming I would have to get a replacement in the USA (annoying, but it wasn’t like I could ride away), but instead it was taped inside a box and strapped to the seat, with bungie cords. Not really sure what that was supposed to accomplish, other than making it more likely to spill.
And then came The Dark Ages. We shall not speak of them in depth. Suffice it to say that during this period of about eighteen months, many not-nice things happened in my life. My house was flooded. My editor turned down my third book. Family members became ill. *I* became ill. And while I kept writing through this, it was to very little effect. I didn't finish anything, and every time that I nearly did, my agent or my publisher didn't like it.
For Theo he says,”As we already know, Theo Walcott will also miss the Carling Cup Final after being stretchered off in the same game. Again, the problem may be relatively short term. I saw him this morning, he has a classic ankle sprain. We don’t think there is any more damage to it. But it is still a sprain. We are sad for him too. He is out for Sunday and maybe one or two more weeks.”
Answer: well, you need your own territory. Please don’t try to take over mine. OK, back to same-sex marriage in the good ol’, culturally diverse and diverging, USA:
Lets look at this time last year: Alicia packed up Peter and forcibly moved him to a new apartment, then got in a hotel elevator with Will on the way to open the doors on their long-thwarted passion. Now that’s the kind of cliffhanger that has you marking the days until the show returns in the fall.
Intellectual Property Overlaps: A European Perspective, by Estelle Derclaye and Matthias Leistner. Published by Hart Publishing, further particulars are available from the publisher's website here.
18 rue Louis Blanc, 10th
Gable did not see the monster approach as he was busy lining up the slashers. His twin machine gun fired with a loud clatter. Five of the creatures were shredded, but the rest simply huddled lower to the ground and screamed in defiance.
Here then is a revised 24 card deck (normally 22 cards) that I put together for possible future use with low level characters. Read it over and see what you think. Please be sure to leave your suggestions in the comments for other cards you think would also fit into the deck. Maybe we can get the total cards up to 30.
If you don't hear some sort of soaring Christmas music, or a bit of Scripture,
COMBINE flour, baking soda and salt in small bowl. Beat butter, granulated sugar, brown sugar and vanilla extract in large mixer bowl until creamy. Add eggs, one at a time, beating well after each addition. Gradually beat in flour mixture. Stir in morsels and nuts. Drop by rounded tablespoon onto ungreased baking sheets.
Maybe it just sags
They were also instrumental in the recovery of goods stolen from the house of Archbishop Emeritus Desmond Tutu in Soweto in 2007.
Brazilian Portuguese, and
"He's the perfect boylet K. I'm so happy for you."
I took this picture last night after I was all done...Instagram is my new friend!
This is all about what I choose to make – as I said prophetically in my first post, “I’m not so well known and in demand, that I can just make what I like and sell it – I will have to have an eye on what my public will like, and what they would be prepared to pay”
The edges were inked with Tumbled Glass and Dusty Concord Distress inks. Ice Stickles in Crystal and Blueberry were used for some sparkle. On the snowflakes, I used Tattered Angels Dazzling Diamonds Glimmer Mist for shine.
AIR HOCKEY + MANY MORE ARCADE GAMES
How many times has that happened to you?
1. Place the spinach, tomato paste, ginger, and garlic in a food processor or blender and blend until smooth.
This blog post doesn’t intend to give solutions to these problems but only a roundup of what we obviously have right now. I don’t blame those who go outside the country to work, it’s a solution and they made that decision. I’m just a bit concerned if they are not treated well or have been captives of war.
Last night she brought her still quite ill husband home from the nursing home he has been convalescing in since his stroke. Even after an intense therapy program, he cannot assist with transfers or bear his own weight.
11Then you went over Jordan and came to Jericho: and the men of Jericho made war on you, the Amorites and the Perizzites and the Canaanites and the Hittites and the Girgashites and the Hivites and the Jebusites: and I gave them up into your hands.
If you are an Elvis fan, I highly recommend this book. And even if you aren’t, but want to know a little bit more about him, this is an excellent read.
The explosions happened hours after Obama left Afghanistan after a quick visit to mark the first anniversary of Usama bin Laden’s death. He spoke to troops and signed a pact with Afghan President Hamid Karzai to govern the U.S. presence in Afghanistan through 2024.
Bake the quiche in a preheated 350 degree oven until it is golden brown on top and the center is no longer liquid. This will take anywhere between 45 minutes to an hour depending on your oven. Just start checking it at 45 minutes. You'll notice as it cooks that it begins to puff up a bit. It will deflate once it comes out of the oven but the "puff" is a good way to tell which areas are cooked and which are still liquid.
Rather than a laundry list of legislation that Americans want repealed, suffice it to say that his major legislative initiatives are widely regarded as weakening the economy while growing the government. In this he has been abetted by the Speaker of the House and the Senate Majority Leader, along with brain-dead Democrats in Congress who clearly did not bother to read the bills before voting on them.
Oh - there is also a baking blend. So, if you like to bake, but you're watching your calories, give the Truvia Baking Blend a chance!
Welcome, Readers, to another blog hop! This is the Gift Card Giveaway Hop, and I'll be giving away a $10 gift card to amazon.com. Thank you, I Am a Reader Not a Writer for hosting!
Seriously, there has to be some kickbacks going on at TACOM for this level of crap to be pushed down.
- taco meat (for tacos, burritos etc)
little things that you can be thankful for too and make your own list.
Two family members recently asked me if I was still alive. They follow this blog to stay updated on my life and apparently the fact that I haven't updated this in a month leads to concern in the family about my well being. So this is just a quick update to say that yes, I'm still alive. Yes, everything is fine. No, I haven't died or fallen off the face of the earth. I've just been really busy.
Yep, thats why i put on 3kgs….
The labor union is asking that the minimum wage for a so- called grade 5 worker, whose responsibilities would include driving long-haul trucks, be raised to 6,000 rand ($630) a month from 4,317 rand.
The Department of Social Development confirmed last week that the Special Investigating Unit had found 25,255 cases of social grant fraud by public officials since the inception of the South African Social Security Agency (SASSA) in 2005.
380 pages £6.99
Unless specifically noted, all papers will be published online.
U Roy And The Children - Yama Khy
King of Edits/Nina Hagen – Cosmic Shiva
Better avatar customization:
In 1992, Lenny produced an album for the French singer Vanessa Paradis on which he played most of the instruments and wrote several lyrics. In 1993, Kravitz wrote "Line Up" for Steven Tyler from Aerosmith. Together with Mick Jagger, he recorded a new version of "Use Me" for Jagger's album 'Wandering Spirit'. Lenny also worked with Al Green and Curtis Mayfield.
The first voice came from the man on the left. “That is right. Kneel before us. Worship us, for we are greater than your God.” His voice rang out with good-natured jocularity. Peter felt sure that his face was covered to hide a visage totally out of place in this den of evil men.
I recently saw an article on umpteen ways to avoid overwhelm. Just looking at that article made me feel overwhelmed! So, let’s do them one at a time. You can start to move forward today, and feel like you are doing SOMETHING to improve how you feel and where you are. If on the other hand, you are currently doing this practice, you can check it off your mental box, and feel GREAT.
In fact, I'm usually just the opposite. I'm high. I'm exhausted and spent. My body is damp and smells bad. But I'm feeling good. Really, really good. Because I'm strong. My muscles have worked hard and done their job. My body has done what it was created to do, and done it in a very efficient way. I'm happy and grateful to be healthy. I'm thrilled to be smelly and tired.
The Uncle Eric books and study guides (written by Richard Maybury) look like an interesting way to begin formal economics. Whatever Happened to Penny Candy? covers basic economics. Money Mystery is the next step in the series, covering career, business and investments. Clipper Chip Strategy covers the economics of business specifically. Uncle Eric Talks About Personal, Career & Financial Security covers the basic belief systems, or models, we base our decisions on; these decisions underly economics (we may begin with this book as it is the foundation for the series). Each book also has a study guide that goes along with it.
Anyhoo, one or two of you asked about my issue with ribbons and bows (yesterday's post), well I can't do them. It makes no difference how hard I try, how carefully I place the ribbon and/or bow, they simply do not look as if they are part of the card - they just look plonked on as an afterthought. I guess I'm simply not a girl for excess frippery.
We’re wrapping on the series and so far Hae Ra has only been using passive-aggressive tactics against Mi Roo. While the other characters are really reflecting on their own needs and motives, Hae Ra’s been largely ignorant of it. I think Mi Roo’s been very good about trying to keep her distance from Jin Oh. Is it her fault that he remembered her birthday? I know that Hae Ra loves Jin Oh but is forcing him to love her really going to make her happy in the end?
Herbert C***
The tobacco seeds are planted and the girls are still refusing to swarm. I really need to open their hives tomorrow but now that I am behind due to lawn mower issues we will see.
This Islamic Jihad leader has gained followers all over the world demanding his release.
Collin's response was that her GP should have been reported to the General Medical Council and struck off.
Minutes later the cycle was finished, and Hannah quickly loaded the basket with the heavy wet laundry and made her way up the steps and out to the clothesline.
Solidariti Mahasiswa Malaysia (SMM) president Mohd Safwan Anang however remained defiant and said that the students will “hold the place” until the Bersih 3.0 sit down rally tomorrow.
“There is positive development in this direction and we hope that soon we will have those who are interested in modernization, which includes technical re-equipment of industry,” he said.
Ha-ha-ha! Now that's funny even if you aren't in Mr. Bush's Neighborhood.
Then there were the white balance and exposure controls. You're limited by the gamut of the film itself and whatever colors it can give you. While you can choose your film for its color profile and even use filters to alter the color at any given time, you're still limited by the color gamut available in the chemicals of the film itself. With RAW, your gamut and exposure range is at least 10 times or greater than that of film- there's just no comparison the brightness and saturation that you can achieve in digital compared to film. Strike 5 against film.
Be the Gods and Goddesses, the Kings and Queens you all are. Know that you are special, but no more so than any other. Use your power wisely and rule yourself with a feather, not a whip. Be wise, be compassionate, be understanding when another asks you a question that may seem mundane or trivial to you. Kindness that was shown to you, show to others. Judge not lest you are prepared to judge yourself for it later. Reach out to all of us when you feel the need to, but know that the best guidance you need or seek, is to be found within or close at hand through the Spirit Guides you chose for yourself. I can, we can, answer your questions but we ask you to remember, we speak in God Code as well. Till next time I would like to thank David for taking the time out of his busy schedule with God to share this with you.
Oh, by the way, ASA's decision to ban it is in fact even more ridiculous than for the reasons outlined above.
“What’s t-that, _____?” he questioned.
Rivars says he’ll soon get positive evidence about what Par-Chavorlem is up to. He’ll get it to Gary who will turn it over to Symvoret. Par-Chavorlem appoints Gary as interpreter for Symvoret with instructions to translate in such a way that it’s favorable to the administration. Symvoret offers him a huge land grant on another planet for Gary to interpret correctly. The fourth element are Gary’s fellow interpreters. They think he’s a spy for the administration. Two of them want Gary’s girfriend Elizabeth to kill Par-Chavolem or else they’ll kill Gary.
Star Struck
Whoever penned this has serious issues if you ask me. Not just insane, doubly so if you work it out. I don't know what else to say really, I'm a bit lost for words with this one.
the word is soft on the senses
leaving the unforgetable marks behind
Proverbs 3:6
parfumeurs - boulangers.
8. Require all B.C. educational facilities to encourage students to become proficient in Chinese languages.
That’s Jedi Lesson #2 for the evening. I hope you’re taking notes.
But maybe not - maybe a match between New Zealand wines and US beers, or British beers and French wines, would have seen the contenders belonging to the same class, and given a more balanced result.
We raced around catching up with long lost friends and going to an engagement party. I took the baby quilt I made last week to give to the parents-to-be and they loved it. I think I may have gained a few orders too.
I really can't buy this anymore, because I have the tendency to polish off a pint within 48 hours (which is not a good thing...for my ass). But damn, I love it.
It's got a nice freshness about it, a good bitterness accompanies a dryness around the front of your mouth.
Our smartest friend (Zachary)- was nice enough to study the injection and give us some information to share with everyone...
"Just look at the DOW, LPI, and HSV SBZA know the passion to create and build a good all-round performance car.
Shadow defence secretary Jim Murphy said it was a "terrible tragedy which will bring profound loss to six families and real hurt to the whole country".
The soundtrack hisses and pops. The dialogue is all dubbed over. The acting is all horribly over-the-top. By all means, this shouldn’t be so effective.
* Dr Rebecca Wong, Senior Lecturer, Nottingham Trent Law School, ;“Data Protection, Privacy and Social Networks”;
“It’s better than being seduced by a…a blood pusher.” Her voice cracked getting the words out.
Finally was the Supplication. As I said in the Russian River Rumble, this is my favorite of the available sours and it didn't change after having all five of these. It has an inviting sour cherry nose and the flavors are a nice balance of fruit and sour. Unlike the currants in Consecration, the cherries have a noticeable and delicious presence that I really enjoy. Jo liked this one the most as well and is now asking how much cases cost so that's a huge endorsement.
But just in the last week I’ve come across some great examples that have really stayed with me.
25 The grace of the Lord Jesus Christ be with your spirit.
Then I was afraid because you needed an “invite” to even join the site, and thinking back to my high school days when I’d wear a denim buttoned shirt on top of denim relaxed-fit jeans…well I didn’t think I’d make the cut.
As he walked out of the city, Khan, giving a sense of the place, said the once bustling town was “like a graveyard”. The silence was broken only by the “barking of stray dogs and the braying of some donkeys”.
So how about you? What books are your guilty pleasures??
This pic of Kalika, our collie-lab cross, was taken a year or so ago, but I keep using it because it's so silly ... unlike Kalika, who is of course, very bright and and on the ball.
Inside the strategically placed jar of evil (added for dramatic effect), are gourmet gummi bears that are regularly supplied by our Top Administrator through the ordering of 5 lb bags on a regular basis. It’s apparently a vice for her, and as vices go… you start out getting them for free, but eventually everyone pays, one way or another! As I notice the fluctuating level of gummi bears in this jar throughout the day… apparently those gummi bears are the “crack” of the candy world!
“He wants to know if you’d like to be pulled the long way or the short way.” Yalb scratched his head. “I’m not right sure what the difference is.”
Old Retail New Retail (as of #6)
Even with this 'studio' dining room set-up, I'm still cramped in terms of space. My HUGE, most-frustrating challenge!! Since my light is limited in it's reach, I'm really limited in the span of the shots I can take. Which is why most of my photos are close-ups. I don't have the opportunity to take shots with wide spans, gorgeous back-drops and backgrounds, or fully-set tables and place settings.
Now I didn’t want the top piece to stay exposed and I didn’t want fabric on the top, because I was afraid it would get dirty and since I would be stapling it on I wouldn’t be able to remove it and wash it.
First, let me say that when you are running along side a bike and a Rip Stick, you just naturally run a little faster. So I was feeling pretty good about this little family exercise outing. And then my son challenged me to a race going uphill on his Rip Stick.
Welcome to the fourth edition of The Pulse -- The State of the Art -- a survey in words and pictures of the online artist community. Nearly 150 artists have answered a list of questions which make up The Pulse. Their responses will be presented as a series of online and print projects. Links to the first two projects, Secret Sunday and The Book Guild, can be found on the sidebar of my blog.
Why on earth would they feel the need to show the world they are intellectually challenged on how to do the simple task of pulling up their pants?
Because, you know, this lawsuit isn't all she's done. She's also been a hell of a pal to me.
What if you could return to the road not taken?
Boil Time: 90 min
I’m about to turn 26… It’s 2012… I haven’t posted here that often (like I said I would) so with so many reasons to post… I’ve been thinking…
34. In a sense, I am Jacob Horner. —John Barth, The End of the Road (1958)
Scorching sand burned at her feet and bitterness ate at her heart. Mellie pumped her legs as fast as they would go. Her feet pounded with the rhythm of her emotions, beating a tempo with the crashing waves. Run-a-way. Run-a-way. Run-a-way. Adrenaline pulsed through her veins, quickening her step.
There's one song that's just been hitting me lately. Love it. Love the sound and absolutely love the words.
3:36 Michelle Obama’s reaction to ‘big ear joke.’ Awesome.
Dear Lord, help me to stick with the true gospel, and indeed Lord forget about the rest. Help me not to worry about how many people are made to feel good or become highly motivated, unless they are motivated to love and serve you. Teach us your ways and lead us down the plain, uncomplicated path of truth for your name’s sake.
The game show has been a lost art form in Australia having been replaced with oversized scratchies (Deal Or No Deal) or hyperactive nonsense (Millionaire Hotseat) which makes Letters & Numbers appearance all the more enjoyable. While Channel 7 were forcing contestants to catch ping pong balls in a box strapped to their butt SBS were getting back to basics with a local version of the UK’s Countdown. Letters & Numbers isn’t flashy, but it doesn’t have to be; it’s still the best game show on TV.
Radishes
* ensures that the Member States comply with obligations under the Treaties, and
So our plans have been shelved for the moment - we attempted to do some sewing together yesterday afternoon at her request (boredom had set in I think!) but after about half an hour she had had enough and curled up on the sofa under the blanket watching a DVD.
it’s true I didn’t much like drugs
Sharing my joys, rigors and like,
Read them again;
That record was later broken by it’s sequel, Blues Brothers 2000.
… unless you already had a left-fielder and really needed a center fielder. You couldn't really put Rice in center. You would really have no choice but …
2008: Unnamed dkb/br c by Bernardini. Unraced.
I TAKE IT ALL BACK
When it feels like you have it all on the paper, NOT in YOU any longer, walk away. Take a break and let yourSelf Be.
*The messages. While a jumbles mess, the messages were still good ones to take on and I am glad someone is trying to get them out there. Drunk driving (and underage drinking in general!), gay rights, learning not to be so shallow and judgmental of people. All very good things to get out to teens.
I shrugged a little. "Others might not agree with me, but I think all promises are equal. What I mean is that some promises might be bigger than others, but they're all important, and once someone makes a promise, it's important to keep those promises as much as possible. Sometimes things will happen that might keep someone from keeping a promise, but that person still needs to make an effort. That's part of integrity."
My grandfather and I really had no relationship with each other. He died when I was 10 and I never really spoke to him except in a dream once many years later.
that the larks prefer to listen to him, and the roosters refuse to
DL: Jake Bequette, Arkansas
2. The death of Jesus through the betrayal of Judas (dark stick) played a part in the formation of the Trinity. The ‘sticks’(apostles) were Jesus’ representatives on earth after his ascension.
The band worked closely with Warhol in the 60’s and the king of the pop art designed the banana illustration appearing on the cover of their first 1967 commercially released album “The Velvet Underground and Nico ”.
Most remarkable of all is that Northern Scotland (57ºN latitude) was almost the last to be hit. Throughout November, temperatures remained a balmy 50ºF. Even (spring-flowering) gorse burst into bloom. It recalled an equally abnormal episode in April this year, where temperatures in the same corner of Scotland hit all-time highs.
I met my friend Nester for coffee the other day. We always say we are going to meet for coffee, but actually its just to grab a cup, talk as fast as we can about 9,000 different things before we run out, jump in one of our cars, and then hit the thrifts stores. I love going thrifting with Nester. We walk in together, split apart, meet back up, show each other what we found, try on clothes, and then I always model something for her to get her honest opinion, which she will always give. We talk, share, dream, usually repeating things over and over because we are easily distracted by all the junk just screaming to be taken home! When I leave our thrifting adventures I always feel so happy, almost giddy. I guess its spending time with a dear friend doing something that I love. Thrifting is my therapy. Digging though all that junk, the hunt, the projects that come to mind, the dreaming up ideas from different cast off pieces, it just fills me up. But also to thrift with someone you love spending time with who also appreciates the hunt, well that is just about the best thing.
It’s unsurprising that Gleave is thinking in terms of the long-game, considering it’s taken him eight years to come up, unencumbered by hype, on pop’s inside track. In 2006, the first incarnation of Example emerged – as a semi-novelty, sample-reliant rapper from the mean streets of Fulham (less street, more cul-de-sac) who was the last act signed to Mike Skinner’s ill-fated vanity label, The Beats.
Attributes: Agility-d8, Smarts-d6, Spirit-d8, Strength-d6, Vigor-d10
I started by broaching a delicate subject: “I don’t mean to pry, Sandra, but have you or any of your friends recently received an unwelcome letter from a clinic specialising in the treatment of sexually transmitted diseases.”
I am an expert and I am a professional.
cannot catch–words, slippery fish thrown out.
I have something that I need to say to you, however, I'm not so sure I'm ready to say it yet. I need some time to digest the truth of what it is and figure out how I'm going to say it so that it doesn't sound too crazy. It may take a while for me to do this. I'm working on it. My therapist is helping me, but I haven't gotten there yet. I will. Hopefully I will do so soon.
Monday: Mailbox Monday & What are you reading?
"lake house" was recently painted from dark brown overall to
None of this should be surprising. In a global marketplace, there is a strong incentive to cut the cost of labor, either by outsourcing production or by insourcing workers. This two-way process will continue until wage rates are more or less the same throughout the world. So it doesn’t matter how low the wages are in labor-importing countries. What matters is whether the wages are even lower in labor-exporting countries. Such is the logic of globalization.
Especially when the peach ice cream is nestled inside a lovely waffle cone. This has been one of my favorite sweet treats lately. I think the peachness of it makes me think it's summer time. Somehow, I never get to finish the entire portion of ice creamy goodness all by myself. I have a little boy whose eyes light up when he sees me walking into the room with it and suddenly any toy he was playing with is forgotten.
Day 2 we relaxed at home on a rainy day and let the girls watch movies and make cupcakes. We also did a bike riding tour of the Stanford Campus (put on by Jen). The campus is magnificent. I loved all the architecture and green foliage.
At least the EDL were prepared to stand up and be counted.
These nomadic people were considered so dangerous and disruptive that the Qin Dynasty began construction of the Great Wall to protect Northern China from Xiongnu attacks.
Let in no agony’s thrall
The other day, after the Florida primary, I heard possibly the greatest political metaphor I've ever heard, in reference to Newt Gingrich's reasoning behind staying the Republican primary race.
15. The brain operates on the same amount of power as 10-watt light bulb. The cartoon image of a light bulb over your head when a great thought occurs isn’t too far off the mark. Your brain generates as much energy as a small light bulb even when you’re sleeping.
I love the white tree as its quite elegant and simple but i think that i do prefer the black one.
Los Angeles County Arboretum & Botanic Garden
Sec. 1021, the bill’s discretionary detention provision, authorizes the President to detain persons who “substantially supported” forces “associated” with al-Qaeda or the Taliban that “are engaged in hostilities” against the U.S. or its “coalition partners.” None of the quoted terms are defined. We do not know what constitutes substantial support, hostilities, or our coalition partners. Critically, the bill does not attempt to define “associated forces,” either. Without knowing what qualifies as an associated force, no one can be sure they are safe from the government’s detention.
My immediate reactions was likely similar to those of everyone else--run a quick inventory of the family. Where were they and did they know? I called my recently widowed mother who was angry and frightened. As soon as I felt she was calm I began calling the kids, and the the unthinkable happened. The Pentagon!
There isn't a meal that I cook or an outfit that I wear these days that doesn't come from that place.
Julia, who has no face, is depicted at various ages from 3 through 67, enjoying the benefits of various Obama-backed welfare-state programs.
UPDATE: Bonus coverage! At Tennessee, players don’t get suspended, they get… they get… hell, they get told they have something to do. No, really.
Red Boots - £10 Ebay
This morning the horizon is dark grey in the north - whether from fire or rain we cannot yet tell. There is a touch of moisture on the wind although I cannot smell that magical rain smell. But then I am not an elephant. We pass one heading directly towards the dark sky, the rhythm of his steady pace belying his traveling speed. A flock of open bill storks pass overhead in classic V formation heading the same way. Their wings flicker white against the dark clouds.
1 dollop
Collecting your jar of hearts
Until the end of September, I will be accepting electronic submissions of YA novels with the following exceptions (based not on prejudice so much as on what I've got brewing in the lab already):
only when siblings were at throats
There is a spin that Gordon Brown like other people will say things that they don't really mean. So, Labour spinners are actively saying that the Prime Minister is disingenuous as a defence to a worse perception. It is truly so very disappointing that this is the man who already leads us, and that Labour supporters are paying their subs for an army of spin masters who must go on television to make excuses for Brown. If the Prime Minister was lacking in frankness and sincerity in that interview, and his cheer-leaders are shouting this fact from the rooftops; then why should we ever believe a single word he ever has to say?
Taylor Swift ft. The Civil Wars - Safe & Sound (The Hunger Games)
Here are my 5 folders again, and how I’m doing so far with each one:
His gaze piercing the dark.
Oh and did I mention you're a bunch of selfish whiners?
He said that my kids spend too much time with me and that I need to farm them out.
But last Thursday at the required public meeting with the Beachside Properties Inc, citizens held in their hands copies of the environmental reports and Ministry responses that were originally denied them – all thanks to the folks at the Graeme Hall Nature Sanctuary who somehow managed to obtain copies of the reports and put them on the internet at their Chancery Lane – Long Beach resource page.
First let me start by saying that mama bunny is still here with us. Don't want to freak anyone out yet...lol
I am *still* working on finishing up Operation: Endgame.
Within a few months, I was stationed in England and quickly discovered that the popular duo was HUGE in their native country, and rightfully so.
I have some of your clothes. Mom gave me your pajamas to wear when I spent the night, and the beige ones just aren't my style. I don't think they were yours, either. Bears on a man who made each different tartan his own? Exactly. I can't bring myself to do anything with them, toss them or give them to an unknown who might not appreciate who you were. I was across the country when you died, and part of me worries that I'll be discarding what you wore when you told K you were glad she'd made the trip safely, when you last fell asleep with Mom making sure you'd taken those pills. You'd think this was no big deal, put them in a bag already, but I can't do it, and I can't bring myself to ask her which pair they were. It wouldn't be fair. Some of these clothes are still in a bag in my hallway. I caught Cricket laying on them, right there in the upright suitcase, and I love that she did, because you would have gotten a kick out of it. I would have called you to tell you, 30 seconds of nothing of consequence punctuated by a giggle, and we would have said our goodbyes. Until the next silly thing happened. I think about calling you like this a lot, particularly with each and every dumb pun I know would get a laugh and a shake of your head. It still takes a few seconds to realize it just can't happen.
The issue carries the coverline “Catherine Middleton, the making of a modern princess” and looks back at the magazine’s 95-year history of covering royal weddings.
Here’s the deal. Even if the Lord says directly (or rather, most indirectly via several translations from original texts) that we are to spread the Word – I would say that we have something to consider: Why would the Lord say this? Isn’t the Lord the Alpha and the Omega? He is the beginning and the end and everything in between! Any one of his creatures will know this!
Apart from redistribution, which enables blacks to secure loans to buy or lease land from the government, the land reform programme also includes restitution (state sanctioned theft), by which black communities recover ancestral land.
ANY photo upload site is a place where you open yourself AND your images to outside 'factors'!
Looking back, I know I made a great choice for me and my baby as far as our birth plan. I would absolutely recommend Hypnobirthing to ANYONE, and for first time moms, I wouldn’t read ANYTHING before you’ve read the Hypnobirthing book. Much of the literature, online reading and videos available can cause a lot of unneccessary fear. Yes, you will probably have some aprehension regardless, as this is a complete unknown, but it doesn’t have to be the “scary experience” our society often makes it out to be. No matter what kind of birth you want, you and your baby can benefit from this method. Those who casually say “oh we’re going to try to do it naturally but we’ll see how it goes” are usually not mentally prepared for the challenge. For women who would really like to have a natural birth, you have to go into it with a completely dedicated mindset and an understanding of what is going on, as well as a supportive birth team that knows your wishes! I can’t say enough how important it was that we had Dawn the doula for support, and our midwife and the hospital staff on board (with a copy of our written birth plan in hand)! You CAN do this! I will do it all over again the next time around…and I’m actually very excited about round 2!
How to Mother
snaking conduits of slick poison,
6 purely
Or, at least, I did once I opened my eyes and found myself lip to lip with a large yellow beak.
I am now refusing to cook in my kitchen. I have thrown a lot of our food away. And I will only eat items from the fridge. Each time I nervously enter the kitchen, I mentally prepare myself, make sure I'm not holding anything breakable, and I shout loudly and clap to give them a chance to at least run away and hide so that I don't have to see them strolling around on my kitchen surfaces.
At long last Blonde Redhead took to the stage. Wearing a white wisp of a dress matching her dainty demeanor, the arrestingly attractive Kazu Makino and equally stunning identical twin Italian brothers Simone and Amedeo Pace commanded immediate attention as they delved into the slow-burning “Black Guitar” off their latest effort, Penny Sparkle. Featuring vocal parts by both Amedeo and Kazu, the song took on a theatrical air backdropped by cool blue stage lights and dense fog-machine clouds as the two floated around each other during the vocal tradeoff.
Focus. I like it.
I first decorated Allie's room with a traditional, cottage theme, using antiques and lots of white.
P.S. Don't tell Zephyr about this, cause he don't know yet.
Thankfully we had a lasagna in the freezer that got pulled out for dinner on Sunday.
Tra tutte le partecipanti al Challenge ne verrá estratta una con il sistema Random che riceverá in regalo questo Glitter Glue"Ice Sickles"
1 seasons
If you cant read it it says:
PIL Rise UK
Sleep eluded me as I tried to struggle with a bad cold and cough. In the middle of the night the cool breeze relaxed my restless heart and tired body. I tried to sit up and work on the lappie but somehow did not have the strength. The drumbeat in the cell indicated a text message. There are times when the heart is torn between longing and loss. It’s an emotion which can’t be really described. Tears know not for what reason they flow. My vision blurred I slid out of bed and went to the terrace. Apart from a constant hum of the refrigerator the entire house was bathed in silent glow of the night-light. I still believe that heartstrings are tuned irrespective of physical distances and unseen heard melodies are the ones that make life worth what it is.
The very first post I wrote for this blog almost 5 years ago was called Aiming Low and was about marketers' unrelenting stupidity at targeting young people in advertising.
Roll out dough between two sheets of lightly floured baking paper until 3mm thick. Use a 4cm (1½in) cookie cutter to cut out cookies. Use a paring knife to trim stray bits of cranberry from edges – if the dough gets too soft, place it in the freezer for 5 minutes. Place cookies onto prepared sheets, 5cm (2in) apart, and bake until lightly golden on the edges, about 20 minutes.
What is the book about? It’s about a boy and his two dogs, the things they go through together, hunting coons, making miracles happen, saving each others’ lives.
Place the chicken in a pan and cover with the buttermilk , 2 tsp. salt and nice dose of hot sauce; allow to set covered in the refrigerator for at least 2 hours , overnight even better. Remove chicken and allow to drain over wire rack set in pan. Combine the flour ,pepper and season salt ; whisk to combine. Dredge the chicken in the flour and shake off excess flour. In a large frying pan add the lard and heat until melted on medium heat. Add vegetable oil if needed to fill pan no more then half way. Oil is ready when a handle of a wooden spoon placed in the oil bubbles. Add the chicken , but do not over crowd pan. Fry about 10 minutes per side until golden. Remove to a rack to drain when finished.
Blushful as you jitterbug across an ice-rink,
They've flashed their bums! It's shocking the things people'll get up to now it's 1977. I've got a good mind to ring Mary Whitehouse. Wherever will this Rock and Roll anarchy end? I predict, if it's not checked, it'll end with people wearing meat bikinis. And I'm making that prediction in 1977.
Christine x
-wait 30 minutes
It was fiery because I felt
Hitler's Angel by William Osborne
- Finally, leaves are graded by quality
“Never mind,” I said walking back to the freezer to put away the orange juice. I learned my lesson long ago about those small and inconspicuous, non-bank affiliated ATM’s which charge anywhere from five dollars or higher for their use. Santorum clone kept smiling like a pleasantly dressed but maniacal serial killer as I walked out leaving me with a slight concern for my safety but an overwhelming urge to wash my hands for some reason.
Over the next three days, I learned how to be a mama of babies in the NICU. I learned about beeps and alarms and three-hour schedules. I saw the names on the isolettes and knew those were my babies. I saw their daddy's nose on their tiny, raw faces and knew those were my babies. I was pumping my breast milk every two hours around the clock to give to my babies. But it was a very intellectual experience. My brain knew those were my babies.
* * * Somebody said you don't need an education to be a mother.... somebody
I’ve said it a thousand times before and I’ll say it again: I love working with other artists!
I spy a hummingbird
We’re not given a choice in regards to the appearance, inclinations, lineage, or location of our bodies when we arrive on Earth. Additionally, human civilization, and it’s massive infrastructure, is already well-established before we arrive.
I’m almost 23 weeks and munchkin is doing well. I’m finally showing! The picture is me at 20 weeks. I’m a little bigger now. I’m also feeling her kick and move, which I’m enjoying a lot! I love feeling her moving around. We’re still waiting to be able to feel her from the outside but I think it will happen soon.
Junior Longboard Final (15-17)
She is being held without bond and charged with three counts of lewd or indecent proposals or acts to a child under 16.
While I was sitting in a suite tonight, waiting for a search warrant to go through, I just kept thinking about the song, “For the Moments I Feel Faint” by Relient K. It was a big song for me in high school. The only line I could remember of the song was a part of the chorus, “You’re telling me that there’s no hope; I’m telling you you’re wrong.” I had a thought, have I been telling myself that there’s no hope? I’ve been known to do so, when I get in a bad enough mood.
chill wind
But not all initiates make it into the Dauntless faction. Only the bravest. Only the strongest. Only the best. Readers follow Tris (Beatrice) on her new journey. We meet fellow initiates--those born Dauntless, and those transferring from other factions. We follow their training through three stages. They will be challenged physically, mentally, and emotionally. We become familiar with their two trainers--Eric and Four. We see the faction's strengths and weaknesses. As does Tris. On the one hand, Tris realizes she is fierce. She can be strong, determined, brave. She is learning to face her fears, learning to face life. But she's also realizing that compassion and love are part of courage. That selflessness has prepared her for her new life. On the other hand, she sees how heartless, how cruel some are. Yes, the Dauntless have their flaws.
I made sure I read during both my break 15mins and lunch 30mins, with the exception of a few interruptions. The result is that (at 4.30pm GMT) I've now read 23 pages of 'Crusade of Tears' by C.D. Baker in half an hour.
a clear conscience
Remember to post your projects using Inlinkz no later than 12:00 noon Central time on Friday, January 13, 2012. We will announce the winner of the stamp set and the new Top Mouse Award winners when the new sketch challenge is posted on Saturday, January 14th. Please use a direct link to your project and feel free to enter as many times as you like!
or should I say hadn't, because my darling little lady who has been a non-sleeping crab of a child lately decided SHE was the anti-waster.
Heat sesame oil in a large skillet over medium-high heat. Add onion to pan; saute 3 minutes or until softened. Add
I reckon I reclaim about 65% of my marketing budget back from the agency! It's a win-win! Well, it's a win! For me!
Oh, The Bitch is undone! (Maybe).
The primary responsibility for an MMO is to detect and monitor marine mammals within 1,640 feet of the center of the air gun array. They are also responsible for ensuring that the seismic testing vessel adheres to environmental protection guidelines in regards to marine mammals, and educating and advising the crew on these guidelines.
6.) Add flour to pan and stir
If you’ve liked early books by Berkom, you are sure to enjoy this one even more. This is one of the longer books by Berkom and has good pace balance throughout. As with all her books, this is another great value for the money. And although reading previous Kate Jones books will give context to “Touring for Death” this is really a stand alone chapter in the ongoing saga and readers new to Berkom can easily start with this novel and not miss a beat.
We are a constitutional nation, not a religious dictatorship. Unless he or she threatens violence, you do not have the right to gag or bully or dictate to your neighbour – or decide what he or she can say or see or hear.
I have also missed worship. Some of the songs really resonate with me and often bring me to tears. This weekend was no exception. In fact, I'm including the lyrics to Before the Throne of God because it is an absolutely beautiful song and describes the love of God in a way that just grabs hold of my heart.
On Monday, December 26 at midnight, the give away ends.
Confession 2 is towards my blogger friends.
I feel bad that I’ve preached and preached about waiting for the right guy. Maybe I have and Peter will surprise me. Who knows? I just know that I am not holding my breath for this casual tryst to magically turn into a relationship. I still do believe that whether or not a woman is a virgin, she should decide when, where, and with whom she should sleep with. This was the best option for me and I do not regret it. I don’t recommend it to everyone. A part of me wishes that I decided to have sex when I was younger, but I know that I wouldn’t have been able to handle it the way I have now. All I know is that since I’ve lost my virginity, this huge weight has been lifted off of my shoulders. I no longer have this secret. I am no longer the “adult virgin”. I am just Valerie. I can strip off the labels and live the way that I want to. That weekend was for me and no one else.
I don’t want James to see his dad like I have been seeing him. I want HSSH to be healed and then come into his children’s lives.
If there is one thing I get asked at markets, it's how do I make a little quilt from charm squares. And I would always send people off to other people's tutorials. But here it is. Finally. At last. How I make my quick charm square quilts. No nonsense. Just basic steps. I'm no quilt expert but this is how I do it and it works well for me.
- Cabardès
And I then got an e-mail from Bob saying:
With this said, I must certainly apologize for the miscommunication generated by the server at your table. She misrepresented the Eat The Whole Menu at The Bent Brick which unfortunately ruined for you what has historically been an epically great experience for all of the guests who have ordered it. Apparently your server led you to believe that we strongly encourage large parties to Eat The Whole Menu. This is not the the point that should have been communicated. We like our customers to order however they wish to order. It's certainly fun for large parties to Eat The Whole menu but how our customers enjoy our menu is entirely up to them.
Yesterday, hoping against hope that I'd find nothing, I checked each and every one of the assignments the kid had sent me from October onward and discovered they'd been drawn, word for word, from Wikipedia, which offers handy little synopses on every single book he's read.
Regular vice-captain Shane Watson only returned to club cricket last weekend after a six-week absence with a calf injury. While Clarke said he hoped to return for Sunday’s one-dayer against India in Brisbane, team physiotherapist Alex Kountouris was non-committal.
Decent ambient music is not easy to create. Usually one just hears a simple phrase being repeated again and again ad nauseam, with futile attempts to hide the monotony.
4. Offense is a four part sin. It takes a sender and a receiver. It also can be deliberate and unintentional.
13. Travelin' Light
Living in a world filled with so much bad and ugliness, it is refreshing to be reminded about someone who is truly and totally good and beautiful…in nature as well as in action. In his book, The Good and Beautiful God, the author, James Smith, reminds us of the fact that there is someone in our world who is good and beautiful and that person is God. In his book he does a masterful job at explaining for us just how GOOD and BEAUTIFUL God really is.
I try not to describe comedy shows in too much detail but…
For anyone who hasn't read Danny's articles, here's the brief overview. Deadly Premonition is a third-person detective story by Japanese designer Hidetaka "SWERY 65" Suehiro, released in the US back in February. Sold at the budget price of $19.99, it was both panned and lauded by reviewers. It's gained cult status not only due to the polarizing responses it's provoked, but also because of its unrelentingly strange and oddly charming Twin Peaks-esque story and characters.
exhausting him
kinda genius no?
Last week, when someone dropped me off on the way to the Church office, he was saying that Paul and Timothy had such a good relationship that they looked out for each other and making sure the churches were ok. Especially in times of persecution and oppression. We were talking about a whole different topic but I thought about this later and applied this to our students too and wondered about how we can pull this into helping them to step out into faith. It’s definitely not an easy task to dictate.
Back in the dawn of time (somewhere in the 1990's I think), my Corporate Job Place was built, and some time later, an addition was added to it in order to make navigation more difficult. The ceiling is between 15 and 40 feet high in this particular cubicle farm, with padded grayish-cream colored cubicles set in neat little rows (they are the color of old lady teeth). They are a bit over five feet high, so if I stand on my tippy-toes, I can see the foreheads of other people walking around in the alleys between cubes. I am very good at identifying my coworkers by their foreheads.
Parents:
Recruitment: Initially Elizabeth teaches a small group the game, but there’s still the obstacle of establishing a full team who will be up for the extreme challenge. Finally a diverse group of people are gathered from the village and surrounding areas since they have a common interest in eliminating the unfair tax by their common enemy, the British.
These portals and energy link ups are very important to us. Learning to master them is essential. We will go into detail tomorrow about this, sadly I have got to start my day. But I have a feeling, my readings today will help us all understand what on earth I am talking about here!!
Eventually it would happen anyways
1. the cds that I make for my friends. But I don’t make them for just anybody only the people who I really care about and the people who really care about me because I’m pretty protect over my music. And how for a split second when I finish a cd I really do feel like I created something new even though its just a mix of all my favorites. I just love making mix CDs for people. If I make one for you that means I really care about you. I’m not great with words so the music also might be trying to tell you something that maybe I can’t
Have you ever thought about becoming a real estate paralegal? And not only a real estate paralegal, but a commercial real estate paralegal? Good for you! I found that a real estate deal has a life unto itself and coming to the closing is in some ways similar to approaching the finish line of a corporate challenge marathon. You prepared and practiced for many days; you ran and came to the finishing line. The only difference is that after the award ceremony, there is more work to be done.
Growth in vehicle miles traveled has aligned almost perfectly with the growth(decline) in the number of employees working at automobile dealerships.
Sadly, it's the only the 1792 law requiring all able-bodied men to own a firearm that they'll notice when reading this article and that's the one they'll be looking to bring back.
A Culpepper town spokesperson said “The officer’s cruiser did have a video camera, but that it was not working.” For the second time this week I’m going to have to call bullshit. If my car doesn’t have everything working properly I get a moving violation and the police are all over it. I find it hard to beleive that a municipal police force would willingly and knowingly allow a cruiser on the streets with a broken video camera.
It is with great pleasure that I give you a look behind the scenes of the most challenge yet most fun photoshoot I’ve had to date. It should come as no surprise since I’m a Porsche enthusiast and Flying Lizard fan that I jumped at the opportunity to work with the team. It all started with some discussions during the off season, then a few months ago the head of PR/marking got in touch with me about a photo shoot concerning images for Le Mans. What I didn’t know at the time were the constraints I would be facing for the shoot.
If you have three or more names (first, middle and last), it makes it that much easier to create an elaborate story from merely the origin and meaning of your names.
Earlier this year Taoiseach Enda Kenny said the Government was “determined to ensure that the IFSC is a centre of excellence for Islamic finance”.
There are three categories on our list: financial, home and personal. The plan is to come together every three months and evaluate these goals and see if they need to be tweaked.
Description and History – There is little left of this canal side church but it boasts a long history. A church was originally located here in the 8th century when Irish monks were establishing many communities in the area. The present structure is late medieval and may not have had a long period of usage as the Penal Laws brought an end to Catholic worship here as it did to many other churches throughout Ireland. The present church is badly ruined and measures 16m x 7.5m. The E and W walls survive to full height but the N wall has collapsed in recent years destroying very fine Latin inscribed gravestone underneath it. The graveyard contains some very nice gravestones.
Patient: "Well I can't afford any medicine."
So what does this have to do with legalization of drugs? Where is the connection? Here is my position. You can legalize one drug, but you cannot legalize them all. The industry will simply reinvent itself. Not to mention the prison industrial complex is driven by this industry as well. There is simply to much “legal” money tied to illegal activity.
That afternoon was the last meeting of the yearbook committee: My "best friend" didn't say a word to me. Clara got her candy and we had water ice and then left. I know when I'm not welcome but I wasn't going to be cheated out of my goodies. You know, I heard about a book that just came out that tracked kids from high school into real life. All the geeks, outcasts, etc., they are the ones moving and shaking in this world: Steve Jobs (geek), J.K. Rowling (book nerd), Lady Gaga (fashion weirdo, hasn't changed much has she?). It's the popular kids who end up with the most insecurities. So there you go.
Mason HJ. Occupational cadmium exposure and testicular endocrine function. Human & Exp Tox 1990; 9: 91-94.
by the end of this year
In all, several major American telecommunication companies and many of the nation’s leading retailers endorse the act.
Anyway, Sunday night we were contemplating our drive back to Florida on Monday. It's not such a bad drive-- about 8 hours. When I drive alone it's 7-7.5 hours, depending on traffic, but it was nice having my mom and GDA along. The two of them a great camaraderie between them, and my mom takes great pleasure in exclaiming callate (pronounced cashatay in Argentinian Spanish, meaning shut up in American English) with her fists thrusted into the air.
Even today it is happening.
Now I know better. While I still buy groceries primarily based on the circular, I’ve come to realize that a simple, no-frills approach to couponing nets good money for little time investment. I don’t freak out, I don’t buy rainbow-colored faux food, and I save a couple hundred bucks each year. Not too shabby.
As in, no postage stamp.
Work – Self-Expression
Body painting is not always large pieces on fully nude bodies, but can involve smaller pieces on displayed areas of otherwise clothed bodies.
“Our view is, and always has been, that as one door closes another opens. Some of the most successful writers were once in the exactly same position as you are in now so there is always hope for new writers. Please view our submission guidelines page on how to submit and which genres are most commonly accepted to our editors.”
Month of hares and haring, fleeing on fleeted foot, hills to roll down, arse over daisy chain, hurrah!
Sound familiar? In 2002, most would be comfortable with the prospect of a Sullivan, Jacobs, Ken Veal & Shed Wynn rotation, and it turned out dominant. But I certainly feel just as good if not better about Jeff Owens, Kade Weston, Geno Atkins, the emerging Abry Jones and other depth at the position. I think here it is safe to say: August 2002 vs. August 2009 comparision: 2009, slightly.
I have never, (famous last words), had a problem with parsnips germinating, so I marvel at people who try to chit their seed beforehand. Sounds like a lot of hard work to me. I simply sow three seed every six inches or so, directly in the bed. If you just sow a continuous drill, you'll have loads of thinning out to do, so don't make life any harder than it already is.
It is, though, a little bit strange that Middle Eastern governments, some of whom have been having a tough time lately, have been quite so generous to Western (and particularly British) universities. A few weeks ago Christopher Davidson (reader in Middle East politics at Durham University) tackled this question in the Times Higher Educational Supplement. He wrote of the "fascination in many of the Gulf monarchies ... with spending vast sums on overseas education projects, even if the domestic sector is left to languish."
What exactly is our national security securing? Certainly not our liberty. We have been sacrificing ever larger chucks of our liberty to the gods of security for decades now and in the interests of securing our liberty have given it all away. Go to an airport if you want to witness the loss of liberty in all its glorious humiliation. One wonders if we actually were taken over by another power and our Constitution dismantled what exactly could they do to restrict our movements, monitor our activities and control our actions that would be any worse or oppressive than what our own government is doing right now?
Bassist for the Grateful Dead, BD 3/15/40
“Man is not the sum of what he has already, but rather the sum of what he does not yet have, of what he could have.” Sartre said to console Simone. She nodded, snuffling into her hanky. I longed for Kermit, Miss Piggy. Bloody BAFTA nominations.
Write out your dreams.
You try until you can’t,
The "war on women" theme is another indicator. For daring to suggest
Todays card is a double twisted easel. The flowers are images from Crafty Ann, part of my prize when I won a challenge on her blog.
Preschool----------------August 23(Monday)
Not just the young, even now in my office, the communication pathway always a shut down among the colleagues and it's getting way too bad. I have one fella chasing another fella who has left office after work, with no 'message' on what's going on, the chasing fella is jumping high and low as he / she couldn't get things done...
The old man charges after him. “I had a visitor today…. Jamshid Mohammed! What the hell are you playing at?”
Again, this is a mix of new titles and some that I've been after for a while, as well as being a mixture of 'gritty' realism and contemporary humour - sometimes in the same book.
All-in-all then, it is probably best to stick with standard domestic livestock for normal day-to-day travel, preferably a jersey cow, as these tend to have more optional extras when compared to the basic Friesian. For the wannabe boy racers, of course, there are plenty of breeds of domesticated pigs, from the hot miniatures right through to the swill-guzzling road hogs, for them to choose from.
The show is a minefield of symbols -- Michelangelo, Picasso, Magic Eye books, Buddha, a crab, automotive repair advertising, and what may or may not be a fish head. Each of these could compel a witty exhibition, and I genuinely believe that that is what Johnson is trying to do, be as witty as he can while at the same time taking his thought and work in deeper directions. After all, humor often surprises with the quality of its critique. You would expect nothing less from a former student of Charles Ray. Artists like Tom Friedman and Ray do this very well in their work, and Johnson seemingly drew close to their respective practices in his first show.
but my favorite is from Canadian author Margaret Atwood:
If DC really wants to appeal to non-fanboys with the New 52, it would behoove them to have an entry level title that the casual reader can pick up every now and then and get a satisfying single issue reading experience. If this debut issue is any indication, Superman might just be that title. This would be appropriate, since everyone knows who Superman is. He's not only DC's most famous character, but one of the most recognizable fictional characters in all of literature. Therefore, you don't really need to spend a lot of time introducing the characters to new readers. If you were in a comics shop about to pick up your first ever comic book, wouldn't you be more likely to go for a character you already know from movies and TV?
Tettiz is extremely lazy and could spend whole evenings on the sofa watching television. She loves to bake even though she's on a diet. She just has her husband and daughter eat what she makes. She's afraid of snakes. She's obsessive about the kitchen in her house. If the rest of the house is a mess, the kitchen's almost always clean. She was named Jeanette because she was her father's (Jan) first child (one = ett in Swedish). She teaches English and Swedish in H.S. She loves the color yellow and her new yellow beetle says RAW on the license plate. That rocks!
3. What is your favorite cookbook? I love the simplicity of Rachael Ray’s cookbooks – I have every one. Her style is true to my Italian roots, and even when she’s making meals that aren’t Italian in nature, per se, they remind me of the way my mom cooked for us every night when we were little. Hearty and healthy meals. I also love Giada’s recipes. And my sister swears by the recipes she gets from her Sunset cookbooks. Lately, I’ve been pulling a lot of recipes from Eating Right magazine.
The Upsetters - My Girl
The Killing airs Sundays at 9pm on AMC
In "The Grand Design," co-authored with U.S. physicist Leonard Mlodinow, Hawking says a new series of theories made a creator of the universe redundant, according to the Times newspaper which published extracts on Thursday.
intertwined and graceful in the glow of the streetlight
I'm not a spokesman for it but you can see it in action with Martha Stewart in the driver's seat. What I really like is how easy it is to clean. No sharp blades just this big heavy grinding 'screwdriver block' that crushes the fruits, veggies, nuts or whatever. The juice goes into the right container while the pulp goes into the left one. Definitely no regrets getting it.
When we test a digital ad, a print ad or a package on-line, we typically use timed exposures of ½ seconds, 1 second, and 4 seconds to measure what elements of an ad are being recorded in working memory.
My first daughter couldn’t join us as she had school. Bummer! Because of the bad traffic, we decided to head back to Jakarta without seeing the wonderful shows you can see at the zoo. That was also a bummer for us. M, J, H and K, Thanks for visiting us in Jakarta!!
This was going to be my April teaser, but the last couple of weeks were busy with the Merola Opera Program’s annual Benefit Gala, A Royal Affair (there are Mélanie and I above in our tiaras). So the April teaser is being posted in early May. It’s a scene from the novella I’m writing about Malcolm/Charles and Mélanie/Suzanne’s engagement and wedding, provisionally titled The Lisbon Bride. In this scene, Charles/Malcolm tells his valet Addison that he’s going to be married. It’s fascinating for me to go back in time and discover who these characters I know so well were at the start of their relationship.
I'm honestly surprised I didn't see any of them wearing this:
Damodar asked, Hi Amit, Is there any particular etiquette to follow for a telephone interview?
If Craigslist refuses to spend any time and money to just make the surfing experience slightly better, what kind of message is that to its users? And most users do not have nearly the skill or know-how that they can make it a more pleasant experience by use of extensions. I can probably guarantee you that most users of Craigslist do not even know what browser they are using.
It made me look at how I had treated her son, at how The Man had viewed her son so differently than I had viewed him. It made me think about her daughter, so much like my own daughter, having to grow up without her mom. And how, as a mother she could so genuinely accept someone who had previously been cruel to her own son.
But it was real interesting because I got to talking about this experience with the silence, and the guy said, “Well, I’ll tell you something interesting. We do a lot of research on Caddo Lake.” Well, you know Caddo Lake. This is basically just a cypress swamp.
Mon-Fri July 16-20
This has been a long time coming. I can't blame going back to work as it was already a problem beforehand. I can't even blame my daughter, as it was already a problem before she bounced into my life (erm, not literally).
giving them the taste and touch of adult work.
My favorite of this set is the full body pose. Although it is a static pose, there is a feeling of fluidity and movement here. I just feel she knocked this pose outta the park and I'm pleased with my light and camera angle as well.
I don't know if you're getting where I'm going with this or not. I don't know if I know where I'm going with this.
Brody has gotten this dish many times before and raves about it. It includes crispy rice, sautéed spinach, winter vegetables, bean sprouts, sunny-side up egg, chili paste, and marinated tofu or pork. Mmmm…this was so good! I ate it all but saved room for dessert. My friend Rena and I chose the chocolate peanut butter cheesecake for the table to split, but after everyone else (four other people) took a bite, Rena and I polished it off. Oh, and my drink! While I don’t drink a lot of liquor, I do enjoy anything with gin and grapefruit juice. I ordered the Marquez Collins which obviously had those two liquids but then topped with red wine, all over ice. It was a lovely dinner experience, as it always is at Graze.
Where else you can see Sand Dunes, Ocean, Mountains and the City all at the same location?
We enjoyed the show until all the credits had rolled, but could not find a suitable place for dinner; the tourist season had yet to begin, so almost nothing was open. Instead, after a walk from one end of town to the other, we took the tram back to Sóller for a well-deserved dinner. We would head for Palma the following day, but for that evening we were happy to be living in the moment.
Issues of sex and gender aside, there’s a lot going on in this novel. The descriptions of Tokyo are wonderful. The descriptions of the suburbs and countryside surrounding Tokyo are also wonderful. The secondary characters are sympathetic and vividly portrayed. I loved Komatsu, and Ushikawa, and Professor Ebisuno, and Aomame’s friends Tamaki and Ayumi. The Dowager and Tamaru are a novel unto themselves. The allusions and parallels to political revolutionaries and religious cults in postwar and contemporary Japan are striking. The novel’s challenge to conventional notions of reality are intriguing. The connections between Murakami’s 1Q84 and Orwell’s 1984 (and in particular the transformation of “Big Brother” into “the Little People”) are fascinating.
They're writing.
A couple of nights ago Wesley and I sat down and read this book together. He was able to read a good chunk of it himself and seem to really enjoy it. Its based on the children's song "Five Little Ducks" excepts these cute little bunnies keep hopping away one at a time. The CD that is included in a slip pocket on the inside of the front cover contains the story read out loud by a narrator as well as 19 children's songs like
“I hope through my practices to honor the women, children and men who have lost their lives and who are struggling to survive now,” said Nancy, a resident of Roswell, Ga. “My daily journey will be much easier than theirs. But, I live in a society where people die from obesity and obesity related issues – we die from too much. They die from not enough…”
Those of you who were up there in Northrend with me will remember my last operation was at Light’s Hammer just inside the gates of Icecrown Citadel. You might also remember that I spent most of that time hanging out there with Tirion Fordring. Who I’d already had my fill of, by the way, when I went to meet him with Thrall at his stupid-ass tournament place. (Like seriously, isn’t ONE pansy-ass traveling fair enough for the world?) So hopefully you people were all too busy forging your way into the citadel and fighting our enemies like the Horde soldiers that you are…but meanwhile I was stuck back there with Tirion…who pretty much had nothing to do for a good long time but talk. And talk.
4. WWE INTERCONTIENTAL CHAMPIONSHIP MATCH: The Big Show (Champion) vs. Cody Rhodes (Challenger/Former Champion).
Looking around, in one corner are the “die-hards” who are still kicking on and you may even remember them from Friday night, but you would never go there! Sunglasses, nervous twitches and sideways glances – there is a slim chance that they have showered, and can let alone speak by this stage.
Start a school that teaches the ‘children of a lesser god’ for free, even better, pays the parents for sending the children to school.
What I’d really like to bake is some nice chocolate cupcakes with icing or a peach pie with some vanilla ice cream on the side. But alas, those things are now a distant memory. I’m not saying I’ll never eat those kinds of things again, but I can’t be having a whole batch of chocolate cupcakes or a whole peach pie in the house…I’d want to eat it all at once! And as hubby doesn’t really eat cakes or pies except on very rare occasions, it would just be me eating this stuff. Not a good thing.
It’s a fantastic chase sequence – imaginative and fun and aided by a rare GOLDENEYE appearance of the Bond theme, it’s the moment where Pierce Brosnan really becomes James Bond as it shows off Bond’s ability to improvise on the run and never lose his cool.
It wasn't one of the more visually or intellectually challenging pieces they've done on the show. But it was a visual feast. That final slow-motion bit was especially great.
Children’s author
128.Vanessa M (Tootsie)
Customer- Whoa, whoa, whoa you talk kinda fast huh?
Once it is grinded well add the broken cashews and shape it to small balls. Sounds tricky, but when you shape it, you will find it very easy. Not only during navrathri festival, it can be prepared once a week to have healthy snack.
get to grips with the smooth surface
and streets paved with gold.
J and I went for lunch here on my first day. After several minutes agonising over what to choose form the menu I decided on Green Tamales & Eggs for $11.75 described as ‘spinach corn tamales on a pool of tomatillo salsa topped with two eggs any style, avocado-tomato-cilantro salsa, toasted tortilla strips, sour cream and cilantro.’
I guess once you make your mind up that you really want something you will do whatever it takes to get it. And so, we did.
Creature Teacher art Tom Williams
Hendrix first looked deeper into marital psychology after his marriage ended in 1975. He thought the prevailing therapy of the time, loosely termed ‘conflict resolution’, focused too much on compromise. “What we found, and what the whole discipline of marital therapy in America found, was that it simply didn’t work, because a part of us is always resentful if we have to give things up,” he says. “Also, it was very cognitive – ‘there’s the problem, here’s the solution’. Like fixing a car. But people are not like machines.”
otherwise
Because Hard is just one feeling among many (Delight. Serenity. Grief. Love) that I will pass through.
A plus point for me was that fantasy and magic play almost no role in the plot, much less than in the previous two books (This might explain in part why I thought In Winter’s Shadow the strongest of the trilogy). Gwalchmai still has his Otherworld sword and horse, but if they have any magical powers they are scarcely mentioned. Medraut is said to serve the ‘Darkness’, as his evil sorceress mother Morgawse did before him, but for the most part this could be taken as a metaphor for ordinary human vices such as cruelty and greed.
31. Thee Headcoats - Every little Thing
Look #1
What's your favourite weekend breakfast?
In 1854 England became involved with the Crimean war, which again increased the demand for ships.
You believe it when you say,
Responding to the claims of numerous European writers, philosophers and intellectuals, political commentator Bill O’Reilly noted that they should “shut up” and “stop supporting terrorists with their panty armed leaflets and ‘ideas’ and spineless flags with no stars or even stripes.”
3 years later, she was invited by the company who produce Mr.Children. She wanted to manage them again but instead the company ask her to manage new group. She didn’t want to do other group so she left the company and look for the boys. Because the vocalist was dead, she did a talent search and found a rock band singer, Eugene. She tried to get Eugene to sing as a solo without his band, but he disagreed. Finally, she could get him by paying his nephew’s hospital fee for 24 months. She trained the boys very hard and with minimum cost. However, prior to debut Ji Oh (one of the boys) who has a bad temper suddenly attack the rival group from the other company (the company that previously employ Oh Gu Ju). Thus, she pulled back their debut time and instead debuting on a music program on TV they start singing for patients and disabled people. The response was great and Mr. Children starts to get popular.
· Highest ever plan outlay of Rs. 60,100 cr
I will send you an invoice and please pay within 24 hours after recieving the invoice otherwise it will not be reserved.
Today, our Program Director, Sarah Rial, and I will make the 7000-mile trek to our partner Kurnyuk School for Girls in the world’s newest nation. It’s a grueling itinerary—6 hours from Boston to Amsterdam; 8 hours to Nairobi; 11 hour-layover before the 1.5 hour trip to Juba. We overnight in South Sudan’s boomtown capital, before taking the 1.5 hour flight to less cosmopolitan Wau; .5 hour jumper to even less “cosmo” Maluakon followed by the .5 hour drive over dusty, bumpy, potholed “road” to the Kurnyuk School located in quintessentially v-e-r-y rural Akon. Did I say the trip was grueling? Oh yes, and the temperatures average 106 degrees; the nighttime bugs can be fierce and latrines are often simple holes in the ground. That’s why our want ad reads, “Divas need not apply….”
Farid is the proud owner of the very first Black Dot Project print. Think you can get the second!?
The debut album "Franklin Ave." by Austin Hartley-Leonard delivers classic Americana songwriting combined with the textures of Nick Drake and The Band
The two hours that we talked at a little round table, sharing a pot of tea, went extraordinarily fast and we seemed to be able to chat about all sorts of things quite easily.
I had to stand the husband in front of the microwave and ask him what he uses it for. He said, "Um, well, to heat things up. I just used it...the other week. Oh, well. To boil water?" He brought it in to work so other people can kill themselves slowly by using it. I Freecycled the toaster.
Original Gravity
Anyway, we were all ready for bed around midnight, and hit the pillow and were asleep. CPT was awake and gone before I got up (to PT), and my alarm went off at 6:45am. The kids were SO excited to go in and see Grammie and Grandpa Harty. At 7am, right before Tom left for for school, I let them go in and see them. Joe needed his backpack and Jim needed his shoes (they were staying in their room). They were SO excited!!!
My favorite quote is ”stupid fear shit gets in the way and its time to kick its ASS.”~Me
Whew. All those Protestant splinter groups while the holy, Catholic, and Apostolic Church sails on in her serene waters, untroubled by the bickering outside her walls.
For the trip of a lifetime, though, these sacrifices can and must be made. After all, barring some catastrophic event, all of my adorable shoes will be waiting for me when I get home.
–Thomas Chockley
Making ME happy! I have spent sooooooooooooooooo ….yes isnt that a great deal of o’s!!! Yes, I have spent a great deal of years making sure EVERYONE was ok from the church to my family to my friends etc..etc.. and the list had the ability to go on like a bad credit report! However, I have PULLED the report and stopped it from growing… I have cleaned it up and have been starting from scratch and it feels good!
My congratulations to Mr Cooke for defending himself, his home and his family so robustly. I apologise on behalf of our pathetic justice system that you will have to live with this for the rest of your life.
Meanwhile, Powerade’s bench is as thin as Ogie Menor’s ability to understand calls. Rommel Adducul is the only serviceable big man night in and night out, as Antonio and Calimag were better off stretching the floor than fighting for rebounds. Don’t even ask for Crisano.
Cllr Peter John said: “Local councils are facing unprecedented cuts from the Tory/Lib Dem Government. We know that we’re going to have to change the way we work to rise to the challenge those cuts present and carry on making the improvements to local services that our residents need. Pulling together with our neighbouring boroughs, which face many of the same challenges we do, promises to deliver some of that change.”
For my take, cans certainly have their advantages, and craft beer drinkers love their convenience and portability. Hopefully, the market will soon demand that Ball and its competitors come up with a way to manufacture effective BPA-free cans.
For reasons known only to herself, reasons that a lot of forty-something women would perhaps recognise and understand, Johnson was unhappy with her looks and the way she was ageing.
Knowing now that so many of us
I think I might try to make it into a cute jumper, something like this one. This project might be down the line a bit, though, which is fine since the fabric is a bit thicker and fall-feeling. A perfect late summer/early autumn project!
This was a trip that almost didn't happen. Flight prices were all over the place and just when I found a REALLY good deal (like $140 round trip) the prices shot up the next day and then a few days after that, the airline filed for bankruptcy and cancelled every flight until May! Every other airline was so expensive out of every city and I just became discouraged. That is, until I found a flight out of Grand Rapids, MI through AirTran. For about $220 round trip and with decent flight times. We've never flown out of Grand Rapids before but the airport will be really simple to get to and will be shorter drive than we're used to going to Detroit.
Anyhoo some fairly good news which i will be announcing either late this thursday or early friday may mean i increase my work load but also enjoyment in Sheffield and mean i see some of you bloggers, writters, or plain old beer enthusiasts a little more often. Ill leave you guessing as to what this new found surprise may be. Back onto something i really love doing though, a good old beer review, followed by a little bit of beer related art from Thornbridge.
Or I see a picture from high school. I remember walking down those paths lined with roses or crossing that lawn, going into that orchestra room, sitting on the steps of that gym. And you were there. You were always there. You are as much a part of that scene as the buildings in the background, I can’t think of that place without thinking of you, and how we were always together, as often as we possibly could be, because that was how much we loved each other.
According to La Tercera newspaper, Vallejo will be a “guest of honor” of the UJC celebrations and her agenda in the Caribbean nation includes several activities and meetings with students.
Father Mother God:
Please turn off the sound on my playlist located at the bottom of this page before playing this video.
I bought a bunch of fresh Chinese spinach from the wet market last weekend. My favourite way of cooking the spinach is by frying it in a hot wok. If the wok is hot enough, you will have a spinach dish with nice ‘wok hei’ (wok burnt) smell.
I now realise there’s a bit of gap at the front of the shed, just underneath the diamond-shaped decoration that’s attached to the front of the pitched roof. You can’t see the gap, but I can put a few of my fingers through it. I had a quick look around for signs of nesting, I couldn’t see anything. I doubt that particular bird will return but it’s possible other birds will enter our shed during quiet months seeking refuge or looking for suitable nesting sites.
Once you’ve made it to your “safe zone” ,and established everyone is there, evaluate what you’ve brought with you. If you’ve done this in the middle of the night, take everything carried out and put it on the table. Do not add anything once you’ve returned to the house.
Can I just say that Ashley’s dog is so cute. I want him!
Her stinging perfume, enticing maquiller
ps-don’t make this if you are on a diet. This is not diet food.
And with its interaction
Best Moment this week: The week is not over but so far the best thing has been learning I've just entered into my 3rd trimester!
Here is a project I just made - with the help of my 4 year-old granddaughter. I got these printables from Daisy Company for the box and the candy wrappers - and used my new stamp set for the sentiment. It all ties together perfectly and I'm making them for all the girls at my husbands office for Christmas!
She says that cops are strongly discouraged from using modifiers in their reports, but,
Anxiety and stress, often as the result of a traumatic life event, are sometimes the cause of nightmares and bad dreams. Not all nightmare triggers have to be traumatic, however. Everyday stressors, such as job or financial anxiety, or major life transitions such as moving or divorce, can also cause nightmares.
-A compass (like the one you just gave your bard friend)
Then I would add some additional photoblog-esque commentary on the above photo:
There are just some things about people all the way around, in this country and in every other that you just can't like.
9. Hedonistic: excessive gratification of one’s desires
Yup, Ralph scared everyone in town, except for the local Chiropractor who fainted in shear happiness.
Well, in addition to the service, the food was delicious and when our waiter brought around the desserts to choose from, I opted for the crème brulee. I don’t know what possessed me to order that because I am NOT an adventuresome eater, but for some reason I thought it would have chocolate in it.
Despite the Academy Awards being a celebration of all things Hollywood, New York has actually hosted the Oscar ceremony on more than one occasion. Or rather, they co-hosted the event -- from 1953 to 1957 -- in a rare and soon abandoned bicoastal ceremony that taxed the mechanics of television's earliest production crews.
If one considers that the broadcasting rights of the IPL (Indian Premier League) were sold for US$ 1.026 billion and the brand is reportedly valued at US$ 4.13 billion, this may have been an error in judgement by ProBatter, unless of course the bowling application was never foreseen. (Note: the above figures may be based on the opinion of Mr Lalit Modi, in which can a certain tolerance may need to be applied)
"Really what happened!?"
Be sure to follow my blog for future reviews and giveaways as well
Calling on someone by name immediately grabs that person’s attention. It makes them aware of the individual’s intent to engage in a conversation or to offer up a cordial greeting. Our names give us identity, a sense of self-worth, and sometimes our names offer up clues as to our ethnicity, the place we come from, the type of person we are or want to be. Occasionally our names even come with titles that allude to our education or type of job we are enjoying. Names are essential to mankind’s community and communicating with each other within that community. And so it is with our Creator.
Don Cheadle (Devil in a Blue Dress)
*Dress like a lizard and wear slippers….”Lounge lizard”
I received my copy free from the publisher at the AASL convetion.
I have once again been made acutely aware of the sacrifice that it is
of strangers, but come out from the rest, that they may follow Him without
“We don’t want this issue to create disharmony between teachers and students,” he said.
For the basecoat I used a very dark grey color, it´s called Antracita here. Really dark, no “blueish” tone whatsoever. After that I went with drybrush. You know this plastic minis have a very smooth surface. Metal minis usually have some texture, no matter how hard they try to make the part smooth. I don´t know if I´m making myself clear here. The point is that I did a very very detailed drybrush. By that I mean I used a small brush and went from a dark grey to a very light one. I did like 5 or 6 steps of grey (from dark to light)
The passion fruit juice can be really sweet, so dilute it with some water if required.
Come on over to The Crazy Challenge and play along, we have so outstanding inspiration this week by team and our guest designer Claudia.
peanut sesame noodles. now this is one peanut sauce i can make. easy peasy... i already have most ingredients here in the house. how good does that look. click here for the recipe.
Tools: Martha Stewart Branch Punch. Nesties Large Rectangles and Large Scalloped Rectangles with Sizzix Big Shot. Paper Trimmer
ブッダ：ビールが必要だね。
Seriously, if anyone ever has seen her TV show, "Roseanne" a bulk of episodes deal with how the government does not understand or care about the middleclass. Even if she could only run for a lower government position, I believe she could do some good. he only thing I'd worry about is her getting support from the House of Senate and what not, since she does not want to run as Republican or Democrat. It's highly doubtful she could make it in the proper running, but it's definitely a nice thought.
I have two daughters, so I knew I was going to write a heroine. But I wanted the books to have a mythic quality, after all we’re talking about Templars and monsters and archangels. So I based Billi on the mythic heroines like Athene, like Boudica and the Rani of Jhansi, all powerful warriors as well as being female.
That’s why I am so bothered by the party’s recent loss of two up-and-coming Republicans: San Diego mayoral candidate Nathan Fletcher, currently a state assemblyman, and former assemblyman and current Congressional candidate Anthony Adams, both of whom left the party to become independents. On the one hand, I respect their standing up for principle. On the other, I hate to see them go.
Anyway, to cheer myself up, I bought chocolates hoping that they’ll make me feel better.
+ Take LOTS of water with you when hiking in a desert environment. (we did!)
Never sent We a messenger or a prophet before thee but when He recited (the message) Satan proposed (opposition) in respect of that which he recited thereof. But Allah abolisheth that which Satan proposeth. Then Allah establisheth His revelations. Allah is Knower, Wise;
And last but not least, my child is as cranky as they come this morning. Good God! What a lovely start to the weekend...
But I did want her to have at least PART of my imaginary Paris experience, so I used her pretty Paris stamp to make her birthday card.
I got out the small bag of gear but my thoughts were now on the needle Marge had produced yet kept a hold of. Not only was I concerned it may not be a fresh spike but was also worried because Marge had laid it down next to his own dirty needle. I wanted to be absolutely sure I got the supposedly clean one and that there would be no bizarre mix up. Into my spoon I emptied a 'junkie's half' of the bag. The rest I gave over to Marge. Together we cooked our hits to liquid.
Informed readers of “Models of Sickness and Disability” might wonder why something that has been repeatedly shown not to be a successful model is being promoted by a UK Government.
(Sunday Morning Edit – on the basis that the Sunday papers appear to have nothing else in them other than Rangers, I will follow the new developments up later – but I have typed this stuff, so it’s going in!)
It's not what you'd all classy but at least they're not "interpreting" the song, like they usually try to.
"You are the poorest, but also the richest," he said to her. "Come with me. You shall be my bride."
Let's attack it point by point. His biggest mistake: confusing the shilling Ales of the 19th century with the shilling Pale Ales of the 20th. Yes they were 60/- to 140/- or even 160/- Ales. But these were the thick sweet type of Ales than resembled Burton Ale.
That is my second “In my day” moment this week. The first was the posh frocks shop selling “Prom dresses”. In my day it was the school disco, and we did not particularly dress up. I’m too young for “In my day” moments!
1 subjected
and you can only use pictures from iPhoto, and iPhoto doesn’t work very, and even if it did it would still take a while, how does this work on the new computer QUESTION MARK?
You can roll it on or brush it on.
As you know, the frequency of the planet and of humanity’s energy signature is rising in preparation for the approaching New Age. The higher the frequency of an entity’s energy signature the more spiritually evolved that entity can become. A low frequency tends to be dense, almost leaden, and it is very difficult for Knowledge or Love to flow through it. Consequently, it is very difficult for beings whose frequency is low to communicate, and they get lost within themselves, rather like the proverbial ostrich with its head in the sand.
Pretty cool. C
And the melody that He gave to me
As Atlantic Yards Report suggests, she likely picked up her parlance directly from the developer. The Observer reports that Ms. Burden met with the developer/subsidy-collector Bruce Ratner only a few months before her remark. (See: Ratner Meets With Burden, by Matthew Schuerman, September 6, 2006) comments. According to that report Burden “wouldn’t give her own thoughts” but said of Ratner and Atlantic Yards “he did not mention scaling it back.”- (If you check your dates, the scaling-back reference is because this is exactly when the drama of the project’s faux size-reduction was taking center stage.)
Wild organ, fast and hard drums, out of control tenor sax—this was the sound of East Coast Young America. Jerry Gross, Arnie Silver and Mike Freda join in:
Buying Guide
Here is Block #1 of the Vintage Rouge 6 month BOM program by Marcus Brothers.
Mix together 3 1/2 cups flour, 1 teaspoon baking soda, 1 1/2 teaspoons cream of tartar and a dash of freshly ground nutmeg. Make a well in the center and add 1 cup shortening, 1 egg, 1 cup sugar, 1/2 cup milk and 1/2 teaspoon vanilla. Mix well.
Most American Colonists were English, so most Colonial homes are derived from English styles. The earliest were based on old medieval homes, easily identified by simple massing, a few small windows, and massive chimneys. The New England saltbox with its lower back roofline is a common adaptation of the medieval style; Dutch Colonials have similar massing but are distinguished by their distinctive gambrel roof style.
An advent reflection through sacred sound and Silence
Lloyd George . Depn. y’day from B’ham. No objn. to them as workers. But qua housing. Figures are impressive.
Beervana - was a phrase coined in Oregon to describe the burgeoning craft beer movement that had taken hold here in the 1980s. And indeed, it's an apt description, as those who are actively involved in the beer community think of it a near-religious experience to make and enjoy well-made brew.
For he commandeth, and raiseth the stormy wind, which lifteth up the waves thereof.
Thank you Mom for never saying I told you so, even when you should have.
Herman and Eva Althaus moved their family across country from Illinois to settle in Roseburg, Oregon in about 1909. Herman had a plumbing shop.
At the United Nations headquarters, leaders of the world voiced their dissatisfaction that none of the UN members did anything big to ensure that the moment would be celebrated next year onwards.
If the left doesn’t like what you have to say, they will ignore, demean, accuse without proof, libel, shout down discussion, ignore the talking points and create their own, accuse without proof using lawfare, create their own reality while ignoring facts to uphold their elitism, sue, and never, ever, debate face to face on neutral ground because that’s now how the left operates. Where the right would let the populace within a democracy decide their own fate, the left believes their point of view usurps the majority for their own good. Read the rest at Clay and WaterSun News is a bastion of free speech in Canada, and it is under attack for speaking the truth about islamic supremacist and leftist tyranny. There is an organized campaign to have the Canadian government shut them down, in yet another Orwellian push to stifle the voices of political dissent and silence those who stand for liberty.
Among this list of a few dozen I actually got to check one off recently. It was Eat Sushi. Despite my fears to the contrary (with one minor exception) not bad, at all. It didn’t taste anything like chicken.
I spoke to half a dozen of the vendors and they were all pleased with the crowd turn out. PLEASE PLEASE PLEASE have the V & E Greenline Artwalk event again! We loved it.
green onions for a pesto potato salad.
A month ago JCK's cozy little world was turned upside down. Her sweet 7 year old boy came home and uttered the completely unexpected, yet dreaded phrase... Mommy, I know what the "F" Word is. Henceforth known in the Motherscribe household as the day the world was tossed asunder or Oh, GOD, NOOO...not the "F" Word.
BONUS POINTS: listing atheist scholars who support each minimal fact, discussing N.T. Wright’s work on the Jewish concept of resurrection, referencing Richard Bauckham’s work on the gospels as eyewitness testimony, mentioning the pre-suppositions (naturalism, relativism) of liberal scholars like Crossan and Borg.
I’m certain that I’ve given, and oh how you can take
Previously, i had shared in [L]ife [M]anagement that i maintain specific spreadsheets to aid me in controlling my budget and other aspects of life.
A business owner’s policy (BOP) might be the perfect fit for your small business insurance needs. Make sure you understand exactly what is and what is not covered and if needed, secure additional coverage to fill in any gaps. By leveraging the cost savings provided by BOP coverage, businesses can ensure they have the protection they need at a price they can afford.
Mega Millions Mojo
lot people that if you strike your pup at the rear-end every time he barks, you will presently discover that he s not supposed to roar. This method, although successful, could make your pup live in dread of being physically reprimanded, and steal the grade of a person’s romantic relationship.
Summary of the day: I ate michiotes (you gotta try them, they’re SO good!), let my kid jump around in the bouncy castle like a madwoman on a hopping spree and entertained both myself and her with the clown. A Saturday well spent.
juice of 1 orange
I have business idea which involves fabric which I am very excited about. I am currently putting together a business plan to see if I can take it further. That is really exciting. Even my other half thinks its a good idea!
The truth is, if you aren't living as an ethical vegan, you are paying other human animals to imprison your fellow animals, to murder their babies and to murder them...to keep them from the 'available to all' pleasures of the Earth. Or maybe you're committing those horrors yourself, directly...I don't know.
This is considered illegal in Cuba, as it is in many counties, including the United States and, as the document explains, the accused has acknowledged his responsibility for the crimes committed.
Things like that is what have women doing too much….. people expecting too much and making us FORGET OUR ROLES as women.
Usually, your employees will acknowledge the issue, and could even be relieved that you brought it up and are not trying to avoid it! Furthermore, if your employee is the one who raises the issue — congratulations! That is a clear sign that your relationship is worth the time it takes to preserve it.
While I sound positive, my heart hurts.
Cost: $9 million
Ben's dog is very pleased that I just gave her a new bone to chew on lol. Her name is Hershey and she misses her family VERY much. She didn't eat for the first couple of days. Now she's sleeping upstairs in Ben's room with me, eating her food, playing outside, and happy to have a bone. She doesn't like it when *I* leave to go home for a little bit though. She's taken things from Ben's room a couple of times, gotten into the trash, etc.
Also saw this enamelled spider (Araneus bradleyi), and lots of butterflies.
But when the international community treats the Jewish state with contempt, Israelis tend to reciprocate. The result is a stiffening of hard-line attitudes.
A Song
Like the video, donate to Oceana and give these types of organisations any support you can!
I joined the Palo Alto Run Club (PARC) last May, a group full of talented, hard working running and got a bunch of great runs in. Those "easy" five milers where we'd start hitting 6:25, 6:10 pace I think paid off. Do enough 6:25 miles in your regular runs, and it'll start seeming like nothing. And there's something about the shared experience of a run with others that makes all the hard work more meaningful.
So remember if you want you find yourself absorbed into the world of magic pick up the series of Harry Potter.
To cry or To read?
Here is what I believe God showed me this morning.
You see, for me there will be no spring – not as you know it, anyway. There will be no winter either. Instead I will go beyond the parts, rising up into the clouds, soaring through the pink and the blue, merging with the vastness of infinity - that from which I sprung - as you did too.
PUBLISHING NEWS:
I really really do love character design, and this comic totally pushes me into animation even more so. I just got accepted to SCAD- and they have a great animation program! I'm so excited! (and also nervous~~!)
And you, my father, there on the sad height,
Here are some comments backing the campaign:
perpetual water shortage.
Sierra LaMar, you will remain in our hearts and in the press until there is resolve to your disappearance.
Drying food has been practiced since ancient times. Initially, salting and drying in the sun, an open room or on stove tops were common methods. It wasn’t until 1795 that the first dehydrator was introduced in France.
but only words
Another hour and I’m still here
A while ago a friend of mine sent me a YouTube video entitled ‘Try something new for 30 days’. I instantly fell in love with the idea and as 2012 approached I decided to make up for all the resolutions and Lent’s I’ve failed to complete by setting myself a challenge each month. I’ve already completed my first month and have been canvassing for suggestions for the rest of the year. One suggestion was to keep a blog diary every day for a month. So to get me into the swing of things I thought I’d let you in on my journey so far.
I rationalize this choice by convincing myself
First up is Nikki Sivils, Scrapbooker's new lines! I absolutely LOVE LOVE LOVE her new papers, stickers and there are so many of them!!! I had so much fun creating these projects with them. Here is my birdhouse with 2 birdies that are holding a cute banner (from her papers!). It's using the new Summer line.
Kirsty
those summer storms swelling
But now the shadows are all gone. Don’t think for a minute that cancer won that battle. Yesterday, Ralph’s cancer was buried in the ground for good—it’s done, it’s over, it can’t do him anymore harm. And what about Ralph? Well, you remember what Jesus said to Martha as they stood next to Lazarus’ grave? “I am the resurrection and the life. He that believes in me, though he were dead yet shall he live. He that lives and believes in me will never die.” Ralph lived and believed in the Lord, and that means that Ralph is alive and well with the Lord today. It may not look like it on the surface, and it doesn’t much feel like it right now in our hearts, but Ralph won that battle with cancer, and he’s taking his victory lap in heaven even now. You know, heaven—that place where cancer can never find its way in.
03) Kashmir (Led Zeppelin
After Revelation of Jesus Christ 22:21 I have great doubt they knew that they were doing.
The most common types of examinations conducted in this category are:
Al Gore's Internets are a perfectly viable place to establish lasting friendships.
It's official: I am going to be pregnant forever. Yes, I will be the first woman in history to carry her baby for decades.
"You know what I think? she says.
Daddy and I could have never imagined the joy you would bring into our lives. And we would have never believed that at age 8 you would be in the middle of a fundraising goal to help people you might never meet. Its thrilling to see your relationship with God grow, and a blessing to be able to see Him challenge you through this. We love you.
So, no, we don’t hate the rich. What we hate are the predators.
When you blame the victim of a crime, you put your own perceptions and judgments ahead of their assault.
Saturday, September 26th is Museum Day, sponsored by The Smithsonian. Their web site has a place you can click to print yourself a free admission pass for two to any participating museum.
- Snacks. My hubby was starving the whole two days. And seriously, how many fruit cups can you eat before you never want to see another one again?
“His message is kept in the hearts of humans,” he continued. “How broken and frail are we that he has placed his most precious gift? Yet, he asks us to keep it safe and spread it around for everyone else.”
Today, though, I just want to think about the little tragedies: the lives not lived, the loves not loved, the dreams that were dreamed but not realized. That is the saddest part, really. Today I want to live in their honor.
Note: If you have trouble linking, try entering the link to your card, then choosing From File instead of From Web. Then just browse to where your picture is saved on your computer to get your thumbnail.
Well I needn't have been because on arrival you could tell instantly that the stars where brighter and there where lots of them, and although its not really the right time of year we could definitely make out the edges of the Milky Way.
The Finish - The finish was about as cruel as the finish of Marine Corps. While there was no mountain to climb at Mile 26, there were somewhere between 5 and 8 inflatable arches...all of which I thought were the finish and kept sprinting toward. When I finally saw the Finish Line (still with about 3 arches to run under), I saw a bunch of little kids lining up in front of the barricades. There was a man in front of me who ran over to one of them, a little boy about 5 years old, grabbed his hand and ran across the Finish Line hand in hand with his son. I started tearing up and when I finally crossed, I was so emotional. I had done it. I had run Madrid. I finished my 4th marathon. I ran an unbelievable first 20 miles, well on pace for a sub-4 race. I never lost that sub-4. I never fell apart but when the realization came that my body couldn't run a sub-4 marathon after 3 weeks of eating and sleeping poorly, I didn't give up. I pushed through and I finished strong.
The job.
11And I, brethren, if I yet preach circumcision, why do I yet suffer persecution? then is the offence of the cross ceased.
#2 ~ Manganese Blue Archival Ink
The app is available for download from the iTunes Store, and until midnight Saturday, April 28, it’s available for just 99¢ in honor of Earth Week (regular price is USD $2.99). So be sure to grab your copy today for your i-device!
a big part of my classroom!
Whew. I went to bed at 7 last night and I'm feeling much better. I basically relied on fake enthusiasm to get through the day, and it worked. No major meltdowns (which have been almost daily for one of mine lately) and my lowest kid finally made it past 50 words a minute! (Yes, the goal for the end of the year is 90, but he was stuck in the high 20's/ early 30's for so long that this is a HUGE victory!)
I unconsciously transform, and I consciously rebuild.
It used to be called illegitimacy. Now it is the new normal. After steadily rising for five decades, the share of children born to unmarried women has crossed a threshold: more than half of births to American women under 30 occur outside marriage.
1/2 cup half-and-half
QUOTE---Captain Aceveda "You need to cool down and step back from this"
CD: TIC?
I've had quite a few of you ask me how I've been, and how I've been feeling.
When I try to imagine this from the perspective of Matt Epling’s family I’m not sure if I want to vomit or hit someone.
How can I attract my own attention, since I obviously should go take a bath now and get in bed also?
John 1:1 Before time itself was measured, the Voice was speaking. The Voice was and is God. (The Voice New Testamament)
Once you bring a photo in, you have access to many types of frames and the ability to make the frames rounded or bigger. You can also crop the photo freely or crop at a certain ratio.
For the past several years, I have celebrated Chinese New Year in my classroom. My school has a decent number of Chinese children, and I always have a couple in my class. Their faces light up when they find out we are spending the day learning about their culture.
February 1st- current (continued to use the Body By Vi programming)
Last night I was delighted to attend the launch party for Shelley Harris's debut novel, Jubilee. Shelley is living, breathing proof that debut novelists are still being published if they have talent, commitment and dedication. Shelley has bucketloads of all three and thoroughly deserves her success.
Madness showcased songs from their brand new, as yet untitled, tenth studio album, in all its glory during their 'rehearsal set' this past Friday night at the House of Fun Weekender in the U.K. As with ‘The Liberty of Norton Folgate’ which the band performed live a full year before its release, Madness gave the new album tracks an early airing in their embryonic state for their most hardcore fans who attended the show. Quite a few of the songs have been played live during the band's summer tour, but it was the live debut for more than half the songs on the set list.
Not sure what our plans are for today.
The day I went to meet a man with chickens
To begin with, the film is directed by one of my favourite directors Darren Aronofsky. Secondly, I’m obsessed with Audrey Hepburn. So seeing Natalie Portman in a evil Hepburn-esque getup in the movie’s first still that I saw intrigued me.
Everything looks so yummy! And they last forever once they’re made.
Last Saturday we had another Hugs and Kisses class at Treehouse Textiles. Five gorgeous women, piles of beautiful fabrics, amazing food and lots of coffee and treats all added up to a wonderful day. One of the things I have really taken away from these classes is the inspiration and enjoyment you get from seeing how other crafters put together their fabric and colour choices.
let my life be dots and dashes,
4 chance
His is thick black suiting material (gabardine?) lined with a mad Union Jack print because he is fiercely patriotic and because it makes me think of sensible waistcoats with secret hidden outrageous linings.
2010.08.31 India Kishtwar 1 0 A cop is murdered inside his home by Hizb-ul- Mujahideen.
For so many years, I was so incredible in manifesting anything that I wanted in my world. I would write it in my journal, I would visualize it and I would believe it. Within 3 months, 6 months, or any time frame I set, it would show up. I know manifestation works because I’ve done it, tried it and succeeded at it. And now I’m taking a really deep, long breath, breathing into my heart and soul and being and just knowing that the right people, the right opportunities and clients are going to all come. I need to get out of my own way of any negative feelings and self-doubt. I mean, listen, I’m human. I know I need some of that or else I’d be on the stratosphere to the moon.
Harkaway’s writing is mindbogglingly imaginative: memorable characters, logic-defying (yet never quite illogical) plotting, and unpredictable twists. Angelmaker is much like a finely-built baroque clock: gazillions of pieces in constant movement, adding up to something gorgeous.
What I loved most about this flick was how the fighting, action, and blood were filled with so much energy and were better than half of the shit I’ve seen in the past 10 years, that I wanted more of it. Right from the beginning we get a nice little fight between The Bride and her second target on her list and it seems goofy because of all of the swooshing you hear when they move, but it’s so vicious and so brutal that it’s hard to laugh especially when these chicks are very close to just gutting the other person out. It’s a very minor scene but it’s one that starts the film off on the right foot and the action just keeps getting better by getting more vicious, more violent, and a hell of a lot more bloody. The blood is insane in this flick and it may be a bit ridiculous how Tarantino just makes every single kill have blood shoot out from these people, but it still gives this film this cool and deadly look that could only be achieved with an R-rating. Actually, it’s more of a very hard R-rating, one that only Tarantino can get because he’s the freakin’ man.
It is described as the realisation of the nature that each human being already is, as if an inverted and limited experience of life and of reality suddenly gives way to the all encompassing experience of the world as it truly is, the deeper and universally encompassing reality described by mystics, poets and saints throughout the ages from all races and all religions. And for the first time, suddenly, the words of religions and of the mystics, are comprehendible.
4. Measure juice. If you have two cups, use 1 & 1/3 cups sugar. Otherwise, adjust sugar amount accordingly.
Well, maybe you’ll think that I’m totally crazy, but please think about it. Ever since I started to read 1/2 Prince and I saw that he sings (as you’ll find out later that he has a band), I always campared him to G-Dragon. Yeah, I know that Prince sings really different songs, but I still compared them. I always imagined how Prince is singing ‘She’s Gone’. XDDD Oh, but everything got really complicated when I saw this pic of G-Dragon… O_O
As he continued walking a distance, his daughter who had been resting her head on his shoulder, suddenly looked up just in time to witness the first stars slowly becoming visible in the approaching night sky. She looked from the sky to her father and asked, “Papa, where do I come from?”
1 can (14-1/2 oz.) diced tomatoes, undrained
Started work for my first internship two weeks ago. So far, it’s been pretty good – I’ve been going to the office on a part-time basis, and I’m working directly with the CEO. He’s a really cool guy, and I really like how he was able to give me a big-picture view of where the firm is currently, and where he’d like it to be using marketing. Also, I found out that I’ll be traveling to Washington, D.C., for a week with the firm after finals! Exciting stuff.
meanwhile 100 grams of crushed raspberries and pour into the batter and mix well, pour the batter evenly into the mold and put into the oven for 20 minutes do not forget to check the center of the cake with a toothpick to a level of maturity at minute 15 after being cooked allow up to 10 minutes
Publisher: Virtualnye Prostranstva LLC
The CIA, established in 1947 by President Harry S. Truman, is “an independent US Government agency responsible for providing national security intelligence to senior US policymakers.”
So here's the real question...Where do these worlds collide in my day to day activities? For me- it's simple...my Journal is a list of all my scrapbooking projects and the names of all my imaginary kittens.
Beth’s new blog, http://www.bethevansramos.wordpress.com/, will function as her website/blog combo. A sidebar calendar will have the venues she’ll be appearing at for speaking engagements and teaching workshops.
Bad Medicine
Starting with a wonderful loaf of going-stale bakery bread, I put together a recipe that I know will make its way into my breakfast repertoire on special occasions. When, I have a breakfast/brunch menu consisting of the usual sweet options (scones, muffins, fruit etc.), I plan on using this recipe to balance and offer guests a surprising and delightful twist on a classic.
Thus, what I have put together in the cake is what I feel in my opinion; arguably one of the best mango cake that you have ever taste. Although the recipes are not mine per say, however I always go to my trusted and tested recipes whenever I try to put a cake together. If you love mango plus it's another perfect summer treat, do read on for the recipe. I am sure your friends and family will be asking for seconds to third helpings. Enjoy!
Now the FIRST and MOST important thing to remember is that women respond to Confidence. The way you succeed is with this simple formula: 10 % what you say and 90% how you say it!
well-anchored calm, respect & humble discipline
'All by myself....don't wanna be...all by myself...anymore, anymore, anyyyyymooooorrrrre,' I am screeching Bridget Jones style.
Compared to these states, America has a special problem. These other countries are largely the result of “organic” historical processes that pushed their different populations together. America, by contrast, is much more the product of far-ranging economic processes, like Trans-Atlantic emigration from Europe and the African slave trade overlaid with modern mass immigration. Because of this different racial elements have been thrown together, and are much more disparate in character. This creates much greater ‘asymmetry’ in the differing racial characteristics, especially between Blacks and Whites.
Peel and slice beets very thinly or use a mandoline
Dang that blue dress.
That said, this is a big example of Not Getting It. Yes, of course women and people of color do many of the same things that white guys do, but that doesn’t mean that white guys should be considered a generic avatar through which everyone can experience the world. Is a black woman likely to have similar frustrations as a white guy when stuck in traffic? Probably. But said white guy probably isn’t also worrying whether he’s going to be assumed to be lazy and irresponsible when he’s 20 minutes late to work just because he has dark skin and boobs. We all exist in the same real-world universe, and many experiences are at least somewhat universal. But the particular filters through which those experiences come to us can be very different, especially when it comes to marginalization and privilege. Would I still watch Game of Thrones if it didn’t have a wealth of gender-noncompliant women? Probably. But I’d enjoy it a heck of a lot less because I’d be experiencing that world in a far more secondhand way than I can when I see what’s happening to Arya or Brienne as they navigate their way through a world that sees unpretty women as automatically suspect. It’s a far more personal and engaging way of experiencing a story when there’s a character with whom one has significant commonalities.
Open Boat Time
Front of Card:
rumble. rattle.
ANGELS
Menehune Longboard Final 14 & Under, M/F)
1 pound sea scallops (make sure you buy them dry and not wet, as wet have been soaked in water and will not brown as readily in the pan.
Do you still feel accepted?
"Your decision to resign from the government demonstrates the importance you attach to your integrity.
Con Ed has plans to tear down the plant.
And—here’s the positive part--we both added a lot of muscle. My biceps now have stretch marks. Women who work with my wife ask in awe if they can touch her arms. I can see actual ab muscles, even if they’re somewhat obscured by my something-less-than-flat midsection. After walking by a mirror at home, we sometimes have to stop because we see a new calf or shoulder muscle that we’ve never noticed before.
“When I walked passed a pack of police officers on both sides, they punched and kicked me,” Wong Chin Huat, one of the leaders of the Bersih electoral reform movement, told the news website Malaysiakini.
Let me tell you a little secret. A real Master of karate is very humble, respectful, and doesn't tell anyone about his skills. That way if he's forced to use them, the inevitable butt-kicking is a big surprise. I was bothered by a so-called karate expert once. I had finally had enough and confronted him. The final straw had been when he grabbed my wife's posterior. As I moved towards him, he stepped back, got into some weird stance, raised his hands and said,
Day 2: Breakfast
If that happened here?
Port Brewing Company / Pizza Port Older Viscosity
And write them.
And the sugar kit is a very eclectic mix of papers from the new Amy Tangerine line from American Crafts, which I loved when I first saw it. I love how the papers all go together but aren't matchy matchy and there are some fun brights but lots of neutrals. One of the papers has real stitching on it too.
And he has stood his ground. Running behind the wagon while standing his ground, note, and not running to the loo.
The thermal baths included latrines and, in the most developed type, a pool and gymnasium. They were often furnished with open spaces and gardens and played an integral part of the peoples lives for this is not only where they bathed but also where they met to socialize.
I sliced the loaf horizontally into two, spread some meat sauce (minced beef cooked with some chopped onions and ready made tomatoe-based pasta sauce...very much like cooking a simple bolognese sauce) and topped it with mozzarella cheese before popping it into the oven. The meal was prepared under 15 minutes...with minimal preparation, cooking, and cleaning.
So I was pleased to see preservation when I visited Newcastle East.
Carter, shut it. I’ll get you back.
Leaving my heart with no strings and leaving my name etched in mud.
This Week In the past week Israeli forces staged four nighttime raids into the village of Nabi Saleh, arresting three, two of them minors.
I finished my stupid paper. It sucks. When it comes to really short essay type stuff I get angered. I have a big mouth, and I like to blab about a lot of things. Short papers make me feel like someone put a muzzle on me.
FAILED!
Knowing that we would be getting a new batch of chicks this spring, I contacted a few people and asked them if they would answer some interview questions. In return I told them, I would christen one of our new baby chicks after them. Just imagine, having a chicken named after you living in southern New Hampshire.
Over the next few entries, we’re going to take a look at the incredible benefits of approaching God as a dad. For now, turn your computer off, put the cell phone down, and run into the arms of your Daddy!
The public was pleased to know all is well with their beloved Queen, and to hear it from her own sweet feline lips.
That Math and Art is not connected.
I sure do miss Him.
AF: Don’t get eaten. #RunForYourLife
There is no randomness in the arrangement of those words in that statement. I never understood the order of the words nor did I ever bother to understand, rhetorically, parrot like, repeating the statement to everyone and anyone who had ears to hear – within context of course, but without much thought.
The thought was sobering. As the camp grew, problems grew. It became more difficult to maintain order. There were many women alone or with children. There were a number of teenage girls quickly turning into women. Hood had noted the looks of many of the single men. It was natural but it was dangerous. Among other things, they were all sitting on a hormonal powder keg, its fuse lit by a collapse of society and its rules and norms. There were still remnants of the social mores of civilization, but many of them, like the economies of now-bankrupt nations, were teetering on the brink. One small nudge in the wrong direction … one minor crack in the code of discipline and the Freeman Militia Center could quickly turn into something ugly.
That’s trillion, with a T.
So we trooped back home and hoped for the best. But we kept getting calls every evening from relatives who called us from the hospital lobby, demanding to see her. And were horrified by the family’s absence!
But I've also realized how many times I was manipulated. My mistake was believing in him, and believing that love could conquer anything and everything. Yes, love can be wonderful and strengthening and buoying, but only if it works both ways. In my situation, it simply wasn't. He has no clue how to love. Call it a mental deficiency, a chemical imbalance, it doesn't matter. I gave my love to the wrong person. Plain and simple.
This should be a dedicated air superiority platform with no surface attack or reconnaissance rolls. It should be designed with dog fighting as its primary function and therefore have the agility to defeat any hostile aircraft it meets. Its attributes should include;
I see the vulnerable or arrogant you;
If you don’t like Zooey Deschanel, you’d probably turn down a free turkey leg at a festival.
The nurse came in and said my midwife was eating down the street and wanted to know my dilation. So I got out to be checked. She said I was a 4 1/2 cm and %80 effaced. I was immediately discouraged, and now knew why women choose not to be checked. I stayed out of the tub for a while and birthed on the birth ball, tried to walk around (standing in any way seriously made contractions hurt so much worse) even laid on the bed for a little bit. I was now moaning and even crying with each contraction. My nurse was monitoring them and confirmed they were 1 min apart sometime 30 seconds apart, lasting 60-90 seconds.
“When it was done,” he says, “it felt right, like an old friend I had lost was now back, and I felt a piece of me that had been missing for so long was home at last. I feared I’d have pangs of regret, but all I keep feeling is a sense of calm and wholeness.”
Image of: Disgraced cyclist Landis subject of fraud investigation
I'm hugely pleased and want to thank everyone who's been so supportive of my efforts on Facebook and Twitter and here on Raw Light over the past year. I know it can get confusing when I keep posting under different names, and people have been very patient and understanding about that.
* Bryn "forgetting" to give me her report card for three days and then opening it and finding out that she truly did forget - her grades were great.
Tickets to the luncheon are $10 per person, and available at the CVB Office at 707 Second Street. The CVB is taking R.S.V.P.s by phone at (318) 442-9546. Seating is limited.
On Day 8, we changed the price from $2.99 to $3.99 at 8:00 pm. This was our first book to test our strategy, and we delayed the price change until the book crossed out of triple-digit ranking. In hindsight, we likely waited too long, but the first test is always the scariest.
The thing is, I am still struggling with mental heath issues and not sure if returning to a social work job would be beneficial at this time. I find myself torn; wondering which side of the therapist’s desk I belong.
4.) “Shining”
The world has lost its greatest beer writer. Michael Jackson passed away this morning, aged 65. Michael became world-famous in the late 80s with his television series "The Beer Hunter" on Discovery Channel.
Now I'll be blunt: I write the following to clear up some misconceptions about Elwood's work that have been allowed to foster on the internet, with several assertions having gone unchecked for the better part of a decade. I did not know Mr. Elwood nor any of his detractors, but a few claims need to be corrected (and, with a handful of exceptions, I own almost every title from the period in question bearing Elwood's name);
He returns to India to pitch this idea to his fancy son, Ragiv (Apurva Agnihoti), who is of course amoral having been raised in the USA. But how to soften this blow to Ragiv? How can a lad raised in the pure and constant luxury of America understand and accept India, a developing country?
Thursday – Spinach lasagna, salad
By listening to the small voice in my heart I found my true north and I was able to soak in the day with my family. Letting go of the Hallmark version in my head let me see that perfectly imperfect was a true reflection of where we are right now and celebrating in this way was exactly what I needed to have gratitude and joy fill my heart instead of the funk.
They say as soon as people get to know that their land is to be acquired for afforestation, they jack up prices. “They hike rates three to four times, which gets beyond our reach,” they say.
Unfortunately I had to exchange it for a different dress. A dress that is actually $30 cheaper than the dress he bought.
Once the encaustic was done I used watercolor crayon to add the rest of the color. She was fun to do and now hangs over the wine rack in our kitchen.
Go Packers! (I'll get there by Sunday...)
Stay comfy, my friends.
This was done on the fly, made as one of 12 original pages for a documentation book of a cd swap. (It was #3.) The photograph is one of my signature old photographs; it always makes me smile. and I love how well it works in the spontaneous structure of the page.
Look at rap music - first, it was a music from the gutter, from the ghettos, angry music, detailing the daily struggle to survive, the depression, the hatred of the system that kept a young black man down, and then...
"Yeah, but don't you know Jorge is getting a million bucks for doing this?" a voice interjected in the hopes of deflating my euphoria with a green dart of jealousy.
commercial/what people want
My own scarlet vesture beneath my breast.
Alli on the top bunk with me kept whispering under her breath different songs all the while sticking her finger in my toes (I hate my feet touched.).
Favorite Resident: "well damn...I'll order one for first thing tomorrow then...yeah...you're right...if this is a result of his Other Medical Problems, this could be something where he's going to need help..."
There are two reasons why these rationalizations annoy me so much. One, people always assume the best case scenario if one circumstance goes their way.
I am very fortunate to have a very loving partner. We have been together for 12 years now. She is 16 years older than me and she does just about everything – the food shopping, picking up my meds, and anything else I need done.
1. League of Legends (Hereby referred to as LoL) is a MOBA. You control just 1 unit most of the time, and it’s called a hero/champion/macguffit. Dawn of War (Hereby referred to as DoW), you control armies. Many people. HANDLE THEM.
Besides, she also claimed that a national campaign to survey and identify poverty-ravaged populations in the country was almost complete. That presupposes that the campaign had long started. According to her, the survey will inform and direct strategies for addressing poverty within each segment of Nigeria’s population, including the elderly, women, children and persons with disabilities. A UN news release also quoted Dr. Gbeneol to have said that the one year cash transfer policy for poor families in Nigeria is one of the success stories of President Jonathan’s administration, with 113 local governments in the country as beneficiaries.
0:15: Cue cards would probably work better than a piece of paper that you glance down at.
Below, we are walking from the Guest House to the Director’s office. The head of the Guest House took us the most direct route–through a construction zone! Kim is holding our gift to the Director–a Penn State mug and key chain.
We left bright and early this A.M. for market in Atlanta. My sweet mother-in-law is babysitting and letting me spend one night away! Thank you!!!!!
1 softball-sized onion, chopped
It really all began two years before we moved to Portland, about four years ago. I moved to Lake Louise, and shortly after, Ty followed. It was one of the most beuatiful places I have ever lived. But friends? They were practically non existent. How could they be? The culture there is party town. Everyone got drunk. Moste everyone did drugs and slept around. We were the token christians. I tried. believe me, I tried. But people just viewed me as naive and cute.
Schools of social work, and associations of social workers, have a vested interest in making social work sound grand and glorious. Let me put it this way: if you want to get your janitors excited about their job, and if you want to inveigle others into hiring on for the same, you don’t dwell upon the part that involves cleaning the toilet. Instead, you characterize it as facilitation of world-class organizational systems within an industry-leading milieu. If you want people to become social work students and then to graduate and become dues-paying members of your social work association, that is, you impress upon them the solemn significance of such affiliations.
Que quedando Virgen Pura,
In addition to the Starbucks vandalism, a group of about 150 were seen tipping garbage cans and spray-painting anarchist symbols on storefronts, sources said.
Joseph was faced with choosing a door towards his own escape or trusting God to offer a door and path beyond his own initial understanding. What questions and answers did he face from the public? What possible answers did he seek from God, and more importantly, Mary? I imagine Joseph’s initial thoughts and approach to solving this for himself would be no different than our own approach today. Perhaps, Joseph sought quiet solitude as well as experienced feelings of confusion and anger? What would be your self dialogue? Who would you talk to about such a dilemma? Eventually Joseph had his questions answered. Text from the book of Matthew brings into account Josephs dream encounter with an Angel of God explaining simply, “Do not be afraid to take Mary as your wife, for she has conceived a son which is from the Holy Spirit.” Could this have been the point where he really questioned his own faith?
And there was joyaunce in their sound.
Catalogue Listing
That girl in the red dress? She played happy really well. A smile went a long way to convince people — to convince herself — that she was happy just as she was. She was uncomfortable in her own skin, and she was missing out on a lot. But, still, she never took the steps she knew she needed to lose the weight that was holding her back.
this is an organic pumpkin,
1 droolin'
My sweet Connor James, you are one month old! This past month has been so bittersweet (mostly sweet though!). The day you were born and that sweet moment when I first saw you and you wrapped your little finger around mine when they layed you on my chest is something I will never forget! You have brought so much joy into our lives already but the sleepless nights have worn on your mommy this month.
You do know how to invest in the right place at the right time.
She cloth diapers! Her daughter is in cloth, so of course my son is in cloth with her too!
It's 4:30 in the morning, and this is what happens. I mean, I had a moderately arid day... did some Christmas arcade and sat around, mostly. But I did administer to achieve something 9-year-old me is air-conditioned appreciative of, I'm sure.
At night, we went to Paul’s cousin’s house where we spent the evening with his aunts, uncles and cousins.
noticing where there is a need
The small scapulars with which we are familiar as sacramentals owe their origin to a reduction of the large scapulars that formed part of the habit of Religious Orders and Congregations. This scapular was another of the scapulars approved during the reign of Pope Leo XIII without a confraternity. Although it was never the habit of any Order or Confraternity the Congregation of the Daughters of the Sacred Heart, founded at Antwerp in 1873 created this scapular in 1877 and were responsible for its promotion (Acta S. Sedis, XXXII, 633 sq.). It was approved at the request of the Archbishop of Marseilles, by the S. Congregation of Rites in 1900. Indulgences were granted to those who wear it habitually in 1901 and were enlarged in 1906.
A. Persistent deficits in social communication and social interaction across contexts, not accounted for by general developmental delays, and manifest by all 3 of the following:
Time for the Masters picks. Feel free to throw these guys out of your pool because I never pick any winners.
We seem of no use in the world;
And the bill came up to something close to 2k. Umm...no, I want the $875 doors please. Apparently the door prices were mis-marked, but he did go through door company after door company, and threw in promo after promo to get us down to the $875 price. We had a 10% off coupon too, and he told us to go up to the service desk to pay for it, and we could use it there. Apparently they're not allowed to double dip, but if you go up to the service desk to pay, they don't know that there's been promotions applied already to the door, so you can generally get away with using another 10% off coupon.
To answer this question, follow along the conversation, that I had with our beloved 5 year old son, Reuben, last afternoon.
My handpainted chandelier in my kitchen. It was one of my first ones, and not perfect by a LONG shot, but I love it so much! Looking back, I kinda want to retake the pictures. I think my picture taking skills have vastly improved since and do not do it justice!
KTLA reported that after buying beer, a pregnant attorney talking to her husband on her celphone, was coming out of Trader Joes, blinded by the rain, and drove her speeding Hummer into the raging LA River and double-drowned.
BRISTOL: Just don’t do it again.
M: Some titles are real words, some are names, and some are nonsense. Like "Sogg," right?
If you have questions about assignments or upcoming events. Please ask!
It's anything but simple, and I'd be lucky for them to call me their friend.
Some people know, others don't, but both me and my son were in mental hospitals within about the last 30 days. I had only been out for 2 days before he went in. Is it because of life issues or medication issues, or both? It feels like only I am asking that question. I don't feel good and I am not sure why. I have lots of guesses.
She would have loved it so.
“Mr. Doyle. I can imagine how strange this all may seem.”
Emboldened by my success, I started eying the steep slope in our Batangas property. I shook my head, No it’s too crazy, that slope is too steep. But I couldn’t resist the challenge. I thought to myself, I can easily stop the bike once it reaches the garage. I’ll just put my foot down. I went up the slope and rode my bike. It was so fun until I needed to stop. I put my foot down, but the friction between my tsinelas and the ground destroyed my tsinelas. I used my other foot to stop the bike, but my other tsinelas was destroyed. I was barefoot. Without my tsinelas, I knew that if I put my foot down, the ground would cut through my skin. The bike was going faster and faster as I went down the slope. I was afraid that I would go straight to the talahib an area where snakes waited.
Well, I know the digi is called Canary Love not Bluebird Love and I had the intention of coloring the bird yellow but somehow grabbed the wrong Copic and well, now I have a Bluebird. But at least he matches her eye color. I also added some glossy accents to the heart, rose, buttons and the red around her legs.
1. J.Crew "and I quote"NEW AND UPDATED WEBSITE. My arse! Ok for about 2 weeks, I couldn't even pull up J.Crew, then it was all "NULL/$" and "No sizes" - ARGGGHHH. Then, my hub said try viewing it through Internet Explorer (instead of Firefox, which I use) - which helped, I got to see the sizes of the clothing for sale but it was sooooo slow.
And there you will see your reflection.
Can you try to push to amend legislation about how many terms that a president is able to serve because I miss you! Now granted, a great deal of people still have you as a tainted president due to your marital transgressions against your wife and I am NOT condoning what you like other politicians have done. HOWEVER – This country’s statistics do not lie and you obtained financial freedom and pushed a great deal of legislation to get passed for the betterment of ALL people especially minorities – so thank you. ( The African American Community still have you pinned as the 1st Black President and you know why ) Anyway, I am positive that you have also thought about wishing that the bi -laws were different via presidency as well because watching your wife Hillary Clinton in her present position is as close as you will get to running The White House Affairs.
I have no idea why this would be worth documenting except that there are always piles of laundry in my house. Perhaps it has become an integral part of what makes a place "home". The possibility of missing the piles of unwashed clothes must be prepared for with pictures to ease the pain of separation. I should reassure her that the piles of laundry will always be there for her.
The lightly-raced West End Rocker emerged as a strong candidate for John Smith’s Grand National honours when victorious in the Grade Three totesport.com Classic Chase at Warwick in January last season. The now 10-year-old sold for 2,000 euros as a foal at Tattersalls Ireland in November, 2002, and then in 2006 Michael Green paid 3,600 guineas for him at Brightwells Ascot July Sale. The gelding won one of four starts in point-to-points before making his debut under Rules for trainer Alan King and owners Barry Winfield and Andrew Longman (who paid
of my knowledge and ability, I will support and defend the Constitution
I hope you all have had a great weekend!
Purpose:
Other supporting acts:
Who woulda thunk it?
Normally, I would have hummed and hawed over ticket prices, timing, work, and such… but my gut just told me to do as I was told and make everything easier on my man who’s heart was just broken.
Tried to get up early Tuesday morning, managed to convince myself to sleep in a little, haha.
Here's the trailer:
While riding in the elevator, gasp dramatically every time the doors open.
Read CA, Mohsen A, Nguyen-Van-Tam J, McKendrick M, Kudesia G. Outbreaks of influenza A in nursing homes in Sheffield during the 1997 - 1998 season: implications for diagnosis and control. Journal of Public Health Medicine 2000; 22: 116-120.
"We meet again, Watcher," said the Doctor.
Zechariah 14:3-4; “Then shall the LORD go forth, and fight against those nations, as when he fought in the day of battle. 4 ¶ And his feet shall stand in that day upon the mount of Olives, which is before Jerusalem on the east, and the mount of Olives shall cleave in the midst thereof toward the east and toward the west, and there shall be a very great valley; and half of the mountain shall remove toward the north, and half of it toward the south.”
"Translation" by Dr Eyescope - to be taken with a grain of salt...
For one month practice being a supporter. You can do it… you know why? Because you’re a Supermom! You’ve got this; you’re in control of your emotions and you’re going to start spreading a little, extra positivity in the world! (Not to mention that you’ll be setting a great example for the kids to follow too. I’m working on this as a way to get the Munchkins to stop fighting with and tattling on each other all the time. Because frankly, their fighting and tattling drives me FREAKIN’ CRAZY!)
For those of you that don’t know….my bow maker is available for purchase on my right side bar.
Work on the arch had started at Buckingham Palace in the mid 1820s and it was completed by 1833. It was originally moved to replace Cumberland Gate as the new entrance to Hyde Park and to complement Decimus Burton’s arch at Hyde Park Corner. Successive roadworks in the 20th century, however, left it in its current position.
Lost the need…
A stunning and intricate beer, combining and contrasting the hoppiness of a Double IPA with the nutty aromatic caffeine hit of strong coffee. Stimulating.
Chit-chatting with her while she was picking up groceries picked me a bit as well.
Today, most farms are in receivership & the population has dropped to
I was in High School…a freshman to be exact. It was a Saturday evening, and it was really late. I was in Marching Band and we had a competition that night. We didn’t get back to the school until around Midnight. My best friend at the time had an older sister that drove, so she offered to take me home to save my Mom a trip at 12:30 in the early morning.
20 Over The Waves
In the fourteen years I spent at three universities in the 60s/70s I acquired a store of memories that resembles Kevin MacDonald’s, if at a greater distance from the radical Jewish milieu. I too perceived the radical politics, feelings of separateness and alienation, attitude of moral and intellectual superiority, hostility to Western cultural institutions, ethnic paranoia and bunker mentality, disdain for capitalism, generic tendency to impute and then combat perceived racism and fascism, disputatiousness and intellectual sophistry, negative attitudes toward Christianity, positive attitudes toward psychoanalysis and Marxism. I too had charismatic Jewish professors with a leftist view of European and American history.
The USS booklet then goes on to continue to avoid mentioning CPI, and uses ‘official pensions’ as a euphemism, or synonym, for CPI. It sounds more unavoidable, more authoritative, perhaps. So, when the term ‘official pensions’ is used in that paragraph, reproduced here below, you can replace it with ‘CPI’:
Some people play paintball to get a paintball game. Paintball has become rapidly more aggressive since it's invention. Formerly, a game involving the paintball gun cases that will enforce safety circumstances. Particularly seeing that a player can not see past the paintball gun cases a bruise. Also, since wind resistance starts slowing the paintball gun cases an intensity and passion into practicing and training for your sport. Develop a regular schedule of practice for paintball. It is essential that all paintballers stay safe with protective paintball gear like pads, chest protectors and gloves. Each paintball game starts with a large area of paintballs. But that ton of paintballs becomes a deterrent to training as often as you want them to be, ranging from just one bunker to one more in order to accelerate the paintball gun cases at your field based on your air tank refills to anyone with an empty tank even if they're not field customers.
The preschool that Ella was in last year and this year has a tradition the week before Thanksgiving that involves the director of the school making pumpkin waffles for all the kids. I can not tell you how much Ella loves these. She talks about them for weeks. In fact, another parent who had helped with the waffle making, stopped me in the hall when I was picking Ella up and told me that Ella had seconds and wanted thirds. I thought, are you sure you got the right kid? Because getting my Ella to eat is sometimes like pulling teeth. This girl just doesn't like to sit and eat.
Lisa Morton – They’re Coming To Get You
With your fingers, peel and discard the loosened skin from the peppers, rinse under water.
So I resolve to try harder, to be better,
Polar F6 (polarf6.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
After the deposition of Mubarak, foreign aid, which the country greatly relied upon, was suspended in Egypt. Now, many countries are focusing on reestablishing foreign assistance in the hopes of being able to play a part in Egypt’s new political state and influence future developments in the country (Ruivaran). The United States has heavily financed Egypt’s government, including Mubarak’s oppressive regime, of which the United States overlooked the abuse of human rights. This financial aid to Egypt holds some roots in the 1950s, when many Western European countries and the United States were looking to support those “autocratic local leaders who would keep order and were most sympathetic to their Cold War policies – a opposed to those of the Soviet Union – and were most likely to maintain a friendly attitude toward U.S. and European business interests” (Pulsipher and Pulsipher 265). The new government and its new policies will complicate the U.S. involvement and interests in the region. In the future, the U.S. will have to take into account their previous act of turning a blind eye to the misrepresentation of human rights and promote a full democratic government in the country. The Muslim Brotherhood, currently in control of much of the government, is traditionally an anti-Israeli group, which brings the possibility of tensions between Israel, a U.S. ally, and Egypt, two countries which currently share a Peace Treaty since 1979. A new government led by the Brotherhood could overturn this treaty and “indefinitely affect U.S. military, trade, and diplomatic policies” (Travers). Egypt also happens to have a geographically important location in regards to the Suez Canal “which allows transport of over 2 million barrels of oil per day out of the Persian Gulf” (Travers) and therefore gives Egypt some control over oil prices and the cost of international shipping. The region itself is known for its oil exports, prices of which are mostly controlled by OPEC, the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries, which also include countries in Latin America and the Far East (Pulsipher and Pulsipher 278). However, in the event that transportation costs for shipping oil rise, the cost of oil will also increase, impacting consumers all over the globe, especially Americans who, as a nation, consumer more oil than any other country worldwide. Though Egypt is not a major producer of oil, the country’s control of the waterway gives it the power of affecting the global economy through oil prices.
A new post on Brooklynology reminded me of a fine piece of history written by my colleague Dennis Holt. Dennis had the good fortune to stumble upon an 1885 edition of Lain's City Directory. It was sitting atop a pile of someone's garbage heap, and I can guarantee you he clicked his heels on the way home after finding it. It's true what they say about one man's trash...
Manuka honey from New Zealand has been shown to inhibit the growth of many bacteria and is proving to be an effective weapon in combating superbugs such as MRSA. It has also been used effectively to treat athlete’s foot and other fungal infections.
1 adjustments
Calories burned: 575 HAHAHAHHAHAHAHHAHAHAHA fuck exercise machines lie their asses off when it comes to this. I was dying the whole run. That number is absurd.
Over the weekend we had a comical round of vehicles deciding not to start. We joked that our garage had some sort of virus causing dead batteries or something. That's why we buy the vehicles we do -- reliable with few issues. We keep them well maintained.
What this shows me is a total lack of respect for me and my time. I'm all for customer service and giving the customer my best but I draw the line at disrespect. There was a day when I would have been mortified to hang up on a customer. I guess those days are gone.
The first picture I’ve posted from a week-long vacation my wife and I took through British Columbia. While she slept, I was up before dawn to check out the river that flows through Kamloops. Used my new two-stop, hard-edge graduated density filter to darken the sky. Nikon D90, tripod.
a very long ride. The Traveling Teapot is looking forward to
There is a worthy message in The Ambassadors of Death but you have to drudge through quite a lot of padding to find it. Judging by David Whitaker's track record I can't help but think the stronger parts of this story are down to Malcolm Hulke's extensive rewrites. There are some good performances by John Abineri as General Carrington, William Dysart as Reegan and Cyril Shaps as Lennox but sadly the story is overburdened by too many unnecessary and over long action/stunt sequences. This is one of the rare times where I would have preferred the structure of the New series of Doctor Who. This would make a great story if it were condensed and speeded up a little. There are parts of The Ambassadors Of Death that are great but overall the story is hit and miss. I think it is fair to say that a large part of that was due to it's rocky conception.
Today, I am told, is Budget Day, when the preposterous George Osborne is going to tell us how our administration is going to screw us this year. There will be some changes around the margins, and some people might end up being slightly less screwed than they have been, while others will suffer more.
Well, I just couldn’t get scared
6:05 p.m. Frantically search for something the kids can eat for dinner that takes less than 10 minutes to prepare. (I'm not really good at pre-planning meals.) Think, grilled cheese, think, quesadillas, think, pb and j.
Let my attention be ceaselessly allured.
Isn't she sweet? This is one of those cards I made by choosing my papers before I coloured the image and once again I'm not that happy with the result. I think I'm going to go back to just colouring first and choosing papers later!
- An 8 ounces bag of cranberries yielded 2 cups, once I discarded a few soft cranberries
- October 1965 plays sitar for first time on Beatles record (“Norwegian Wood”)
It is no surprise that most of you are modernists, not totally throwing away your traditional roots. Many of you don't choose to purchase patterns, which we suspected. You are very creative and improvisational. Then again, many of you are collectors of patterns and books; sometimes one or the other. I can say that since I started designing, I certainly purchase fewer patterns and some books. Part of it is confidence, the other is time (not enough to possibly make it). There is sometimes reward in creating "what you see is what you get". In remaking samples, I just follow the pattern and don't have to endure any brain freezes! Patterns are more affordable, especially in these economic times.
* How Concerned Women For America and the Family Research Council successfully pressured Congress to limit childhood vaccinations with the life-saving drug Gardasil, because it addressed HPV, a sexually transmitted infection;
Although remodeling of your home may not involve major constructions like a new house would need, yet there are four important things you need to know if you are planning home renovations
i know what she's thinking
I cut a piece of Peach Parfait cardstock 3 inches wide by 6 inches long and folded it in half. I used some Whisper White satin ribbon and tied it around the card. I then trimmed my stamped image to 2x2 inches square and attached it to the front of the card. Done!
IN SEPARATE BOWL, whisk together remaining dry ingredient
for the first time.
The shot glasses look like miniature pints of beer with froth foam on top. They actually hold white peach jelly - made from fresh peaches - covered in a layer of mascarpone and rosewater cream. The tiny pearls of strawberry add freshness with baby sorrel leaves providing a little tartness.
- As if the scandals over plagiarism in the KDP program weren't enough, now it appears that there's a major knockoff problem: cobbled-up books titled to resemble bestsellers in hopes of tricking consumers into buying them. I Am The Girl With The Dragon Tattoo, anyone?
Rolling Panic Affiliated 2 Complete Rolling Panic Affiliated 1 with 100 credibility or more
Frida never reclaimed the old her but by the next scene it didn’t matter. She was always Frida. The woman she became was the woman she was always becoming. The peace and love for myself I’m searching for in tears is that, like her, who I am becoming is me.
So have you ever wondered if it would be possible to live with all four of your kids in one room? What? No?!
the seasons in the sun are passing by...its almost winter and almost two months since I last blogged ...
not a bruise on me.
I like to think that a standard that can ring true across cultural divides is the religious standard for both male and female. The Bible speaks of the man as one with God-given authority, and the woman as a more fragile, submissive role. It gives the man authority but it doesn’t give him a license to treat the woman as property or an object to be used. Instead, he is to be a courageous leader, one who cherishes his family. The woman is to be virtuous, industrious, caring and a helper.
I woke up this morning and decided to catch-up with local and national affairs via television and the world wide web. I read many stories this morning but nothing as funny as the business with Richard Grenell. Above are three of like five or six articles I read from the Google news feed involving Richard Grenell under the tab of ‘Politics’. Anyway to sum up (feel free to check it out yourself) Richard Grenell is an adept foreign policy expert hired by the Romney campaign as their foreign policy spokesman. He’s also gay…openly gay……I know…how did “Romney” and “openly gay” get mentioned in the the same breath. Here’s how : while the Romney campaign may have *quotefingers* broke ground*endqoutefingers* in hiring a openly gay spokesman but his constituents repaved it in driving the man to resign…not that he had done very much on the official (aka TV, reports, press, etc) side anyway. Many laugh at the situation as the Romney campaign’s half-hearted ploy to win support from the LGBT community. I’m laughing at Richard Grenell…..for being a duck (think of your favorite Aflac commercial).
I colored her hair with Y21, Skirt with R83, and her shirt with BV13. I lost some of the shadows when I colored the shirt with BV13, so I went back with my gray and darkened those areas again.
So, my cooking is limited to barbecuing steak and hamburgers, with a baked potato (sour cream and broccoli on top), followed by oreos dipped in milk. In a way, it's kind of nice to take a break from cooking, but I miss it. I'll be on a mission to find recipes that match my childish and bland taste buds, but for now, it's snack time!
Marisa (her age finally matches her number of moves) is glad to start settling down again. Her schedule is mostly empty and she is enjoying that time. She is trying to find homes for all the boxes and is getting rid of a lot. “If I have not used it by now – WE DO NOT NEED IT!” She is realizing though, that without a lot going on, she does not get a lot done. But then again, tea parties, primary songs, making cookies, and saving the empire on Lego Star Wars is getting something done, right.
Kissed you
6/17 Denver, CO - Hi Dive
- A photo builds a personal connection, you might call it a social appeal. It also allows people to make an association between an individuals name and face.
The fat, pompous professor then bores everyone with Candyman's full origin story. which began in 1890. Candyman was the son of a slave, but he was raised among the wealthy, because his father made a fortune from an invention he mass-produced. Fascinating, Spock.
37. It is very hard to buy dresses.
**Use large sheets of construction paper (white will never let you down and makes the food stand out as the star) as backgrounds for small objects or food. Then you can bring in lamps and shoot after dark.
as they cook together one more time.
More a man than your dead little soul, you and your weekend pissed-up streak.
10And I fell at his feet to worship him. And he said unto me, See thou do it not: I am thy fellowservant, and of thy brethren that have the testimony of Jesus: worship God: for the testimony of Jesus is the spirit of prophecy.
Today we asked Jimmy to go get us sandwiches from Vons (they have the best avocado & turkey sandwiches ever). We were really excited. It doesn't take much...So of course he went to the wrong Vons , the really really GHETTO one that only has junk food from 2003.
where titans and gods still war
“What about the woman waiting down the street?”
might be what wakes him. I back out the door.
Maybe it doesn’t look like much from here, but Thialf is where many of the biggest meets are held; it’s the heart of speedskating in the Netherlands, which, as a country, is the heart of speedskating in the world. I said in an earlier post that Thialf is speedskating’s Mecca, and I think it’s still an appropriate description. There are other major ovals where top competitions are held with some regularity (the oval in Hamar, Norway, and those at high altitude in Calgary and Salt Lake City where world records often are set come to mind) but none that I know of is as large or as regularly packed full of fans.
1/2 cup raw almonds
The program can be taught in an hour long assembly or broken down into shorter assemblies, to meet the school’s scheduling needs. While it supports the schools efforts to stop bullying, it also focuses on bullying that happens away from the eyes of teachers and school supervisors (e.g. at an after school programs or on Saturday). By the end of the seminar, students will know how to prevent bullying, how to react when bullying does occur, as well as how to protect themselves and others from bullying behavior.
3/4 c chicken broth
The drawback to section three is that there aren’t a lot of connections among the small solutions he cobbles together. None of them are politically viable. Reich ends by suggesting that the only real way forward is if financial corporations and the financial elite heed his warning and save capitalism from itself.
Anchors (black)
Men will always tell women that they don’t like heavy make-up. It’s just not true. What they are saying is that they hope you don’t need heavy make-up. Unless it’s garish, men generally can’t assess if a woman is wearing slap or not. There is an obvious cosmetic choice, however, that they universally like. No, love.
While I was there, I met with Sloane Milstein of College Riding 101, who has a new book out about how to find and select the right college riding program. In our conversation, she mentioned that she’d be speaking about how to pay for college and pay for riding in college on Saturday evening at Equine Affaire and asked if I would use my in-depth knowledge of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) to present that section of her talk.
Anyway D has started his English today. I have a range of things from Teacher Created Resources which we can use. The idea is he never gets bored of one thing so we have enough different types of work to have a change. He asked for Paired passages and Document Based Critical Thinking and we also have From Sentences to Paragraphs, Grammar Grade 5-6 and Scientific comprehension. I also bought a thematic unit on the Mayans as its something we touched on last year but didn't do much about.
- Support the entrenchment of LGBTI issues into broader social justice issues through the financing of community lead and nationally owned projects.
I almost always try to read the book first if possible. An exception was the Swedish version of Girl With The Dragon Tattoo which only had a limited run at the time and I really wanted to see it in theaters. And I still haven't read the book. It's one of my goals for this year.
Life in the village
2. We all deserve a second chance – this is ultimately a story about redemption, and this seems to so right for a film that itself in desperately in need of some critical TLC and genuine re-evaluations. But don’t we all feel like that?
Have a good week ahead & Happy Easter!
It doesn’t have to be this way. We can be our OWN kind of parents. We can be the kind of Moms and Dads who do their best and love their kids and vow to keep learning and growing. We can throw out the labels, the titles, the books, the methods, and the visions of what “should” be in favor of extending ourselves and others just a little bit of grace. I’m choosing to be no kind of Mom because it means I can make lots of room for everybody at my little picnic table, and if they come to my table, we can all share what we’ve got to offer.
On holiday Ms Howarth usually reverted to disposable nappies for convenience but says she tried to seek out the more environmentally-friendly ones with no gels or plastics whenever possible.
And then there are other things I should be doing – work, reading Dracula, and posting on this blog. I’m fairly sure I can put those things into my weeks at least a little bit without messing anything up too bad, but I’ve also been staying up quite late these days and adjusting to that sleep schedule when I should really try to be fixing it to something more up-in-the-mornings-and-days focused until I’m done with my work. I’m really trying to settle into being more productive, but I’m slipping up a lot, especially with holidays and sickness. My recovery from other things, however, relies a lot on productivity and satisfaction with the amount of things I get done, so I’m going to have to try a bit harder.
Some say that Heaven is just a projection of the mind’s desire to escape self-responsibility for this world through casting that self-responsibility towards something outside of self which is greater, wiser and stronger than a mere human being. This also implies great fear in the hearts of men. Has anyone ever wondered why God would need to distance Himself away from His most monumental creation called Man to disappear into the void beyond Man’s reach?
Sometimes you just have to say yes to having a good day the WHOLE day.
When the pie is done, let it cool completely for at least 4 hours. I made this guy way ahead of time, let it cool for day, and then refrigerated it for a day before leaving it out the night before serving it.
Tips and Tricks: My poor little bunny's ear was a bit worse for the wear after running him through the Cuttlebug. My plates are a bit battered and left some ugly marks on the front, so I used my bone folder to burnish the backside of the paper. I had to rub really hard, but it did the trick!
The Limelight itself? After a dramatic shuttering in 2001, the club was reopened under the name Avalon, and still entertains throngs craving a thumping beat and a really expensive cocktail. The club kids are gone, but ghosts remain, as do the crypts.
She asked him what they were doing and he replied, "Playing baseball."
I'm certain that I will carry on with this series. I can't wait to read Cross My Heart and Hope to Spy! You can't help but adore the titles of the books too! Ally Carter is an author that you simply can't miss. You go Ally Carter!
This is actually about me, being part of the school publication, The LaSallian. My parents, actually my dad doesn’t approve of me joining such organization. I had experienced writing in publications in high school but this is a different thing. I never thought I’d be accepted in The LaSallian. It gave me confidence and pride that somehow I can really write.
Imma gonna race you too
Life is just not like that.
I have one friend alive; thou wouldst disprove me.
61-year-old Ampon Tangnopponkul or “Uncle SMS” who was sentenced to 20 years on lese majesté offence last November passed away this morning. He was suffering from stomach pain and sent to prison hospital last Friday, according to his lawyer, Ms. Poonsuk Poonsukcharoen. Bail request has been applied eight times and all denied. “If Ampon’s right to temporary release was upheld, he could’ve gone to see the doctor and such a tragedy might not have happened” said Poonsuk.
I have a tune for you all as well.
Jana Greene
Halperin’s insights are manifold in this rich section of the book. Here I list those that were most salient to me as I read. First, Warner points to and Halperin fleshes out how the insistence on “Gay Pride” can actually serve to deepen the shame gay men feel about their desires and practices, by re-relegating them to the closet in contra-distinction to an out-and-proud gay-maleness. Second, Halperin turns to a right-wing French writer, Marcel Jouhandeau, who extolled the virtues of social abjection and, in particular, humiliation at being different: Jouhandeau (and later, Genet) turn abjection on its head, into a kind of sacrilization of abjection. To tease this out, thirdly, Halperin explicates two scenes from Jean Genet’s opus, in which Genet depicts social abjection, humiliation, as a process and where the abjected, humiliated subject responds by resignifying the abjection as either a source of pleasure or as the signifying source of his difference. In Halperin’s interpretation, Genet’s narrators find freedom precisely by identifying with their abjection and embracing it, refusing its deleterious effects and instead creating for themselves a re-signifying and life-affirming defiance. The more they are humiliated, the more defiant and ecstatic the narrators become. Genet’s narrative insists that loving someone who is humiliated (socially abject) requires the loving of their abjection itself.
But, this book is so much fun! There’s drama because of course, main character Hazel has the perfect boyfriend who is about to propose to her when she meets handsome rock star. But you don’t feel like she’s being a horrible person by following this fantasy because you kind of know in your
First, the Awards report, as promised. Despite all your lovely votes, I didn't win. The honours went to The Shopgirl Diaries written by Emily Benet. I've had a look, and it's a really good blog, so I'm not feeling too bad about it! I'll be getting a nice shiny blogbadge for being shortlisted, anyway. Here I am at the party,
On the eye - Deep tangerine. North African dawn. Lovely.
Town planning is so important – why would you not do it? These people are not doing it because they want Covent Garden to look lovely. They are investors securing their investments for the future. They are making sure their land becomes valuable because Covent Garden is so wonderful. It’s the difference between taking a long-term view and a short-term one and it’s what our high streets need.
I make no claim to knowledge of the US system of justice, so have based what I say upon the sterling work of Craig Calcaterra, a former practising attorney, who has escaped from the law courts to be a writer for NBC about baseball (yes, that is jealousy you can hear as you read that). He has written extensively about these cases, most recently at “Hardball Talk” but he wrote at length about them before. Following Bonds’ indictment he analysed the case here.
Fahamu
Transformers – The effects are bound to be cool, but . . . why is this being made? Does the world really need Michael Bay’s live-action vision of a 1980’s cartoon about shape-shifting robots? Wait. I think the real question is, does the world really need Michael Bay? The last thing he directed that was even remotely watchable was The Rock, and without the kitsch factor of the animation format, the Autobot/Decepticon vendetta is going to be laughable at best. But I'm sure things will blow up real good.
-if you’ll like to show case your brand
I'm going to steal a joke from Kevin Bridges here. No-one ever calls people from Edinburgh Edinburgers, do they? You've got your Invernesians, Aberdonians, Dundonians, Glaswegians and cunts fae Edinburgh. It may be a joke but it's true. I can imagine that part of the reasoning for not allowing the hovercraft to run is that it'd allow easier access for dirty, six finger Fifers to cross the river and bam up the city.
Oppression is when a Christian does not yield to the Spirit of God and opens themselves up to control by evil spirits. I personally believe that once you are the child of God you can never be possessed by anyone other than God. But I also believe that God will allow us to be oppressed by evil if we are disobedient. (1 Corinthians 5:5- hand such a person over to Satan to destroy his corrupt nature so that his spiritual nature may be saved on the day of the Lord.) But I believe this oppression can be defeated by something as simple as repentance.
1 baskets
In open letter coinciding with Fang’s death, Wang, hunger striker Wuer Kaixi and four others who participated in the 1989 Democracy Movement appealed for the Chinese government to let them return home.
I turned to the only place I could. To some online acquaintances that Tim and I had known from our early spiritual/shamanistic/dream-time healing experiences. I didn't stay with them long, either, because some of their methods were those that were forceful and uninvited by myself... but there was this one guy, named Jack.
As it stands currently, Texas state law allows women to obtain an abortion only under specific circumstances, after a 24 hour waiting period, and only after state mandated counseling. While these state mandated stipulations are not as severe as some found in other states, they still pose a challenge to many foundations of women’s rights and women’s health. As of January 2011, a woman must receive state-directed counseling that includes information that is designed to discourage her from having an abortion. This information must be provided in person at the clinic 24 hours before a woman is allowed to obtain the procedure. The pamphlets and packets that is provided include diagrams of what the fetus looks like at its various stages and describes in detail the various organ functions developing at different states. Before the woman is provided with these detailed handouts, she is required to watch the ultra sound of the fetus as the doctor describes it in detail. The doctor is then required to look for a heartbeat in the fetus and play it for the woman, if it is found. After all of these proceedings take place, the woman must wait at least 24 hours before she can actually have the abortion preformed.
their residences for the duration of the NATO/G8 Summit scheduled
Above: The giant main building of The Moscow University. One of the so-called Seven Sisters, seven similar buildings, form a ring around the Kremlin and were built during Stalin’s time. It will be featured in THE EARTH SHIFTER.
Lately, unschooling has been in the news a lot, and because of that it seems a lot of unschoolers are talking about about whether or not the exposure is a good thing! I've seen people say that because the mainstream media never properly grasps unschooling, they shouldn't bother. Or, that the extra exposure opens unschoolers up to more hassling from people who don't understand. The message behind both of these things being that unschoolers are better off staying under the radar, not letting themselves be interviewed, and just generally keeping quiet about things.
But sonofabitch, that motherfucker is still driving me crazy. Now the blisters are popping and it's starting to peel and ohmyGod the itching......
We were privileged to be part of the festival's VIP delegation, which afforded me great opportunities to meet and talk with people as well as see things up close.
We got a busy, but fun weekend. I hope we can work in a little play tonight. That would make the weekend even better.
Now that I've pissed all of them off, let's elaborate.
Those caves were where the cheddar was stored to age.
Camaal: I needing little yems.
